Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
Number of Reviews
36

Author
Michael Dequina
Leave it to the Coen brothers to use a man urinating on a rug as the
catalyst for an entire film's events.  No, an Oscar win and wide-spanning
critical acclaim has not put a mainstreaming damper on the reckless
imagination of bros Joel and Ethan, who have made an instant cult hit with
their warped but hilarious comedy-thriller, The Big Lebowski.
Said urinating man is a thug out to collect a debt owed by Bunny Lebowski
(Tara Reid), young trophy wife to Jeffrey Lebowski (David Huddleston),
wheelchair-bound Pasadena millionaire.  The problem is, he urinates on the
rug of the _wrong_ Jeffrey Lebowski (Jeff Bridges), a.k.a. "the Dude," a
lazy loser who wastes his days drinking and bowling with his buddies Walter
Sobchak (John Goodman), a short-tempered Vietnam vet; and Donny (Steve
Buscemi), a slow-witted ex-surfer.  When the Dude attempts to receive
compensation for his soiled rug from "the Big Lebowski," he sets off an
outrageous chain of events that involves everything from kidnapping,
ransom, double crosses, and pornography to a writer for the vintage TV
western Branded, a gang of German nihilists, and their lethal pet marmot.
Needless to say, The Big Lebowski's story is intricate, out-there, and
distinctly Coenesque; it is just about impossible to sum it up in a single
sentence.  While the Coens' unpredictable, ridiculously complex, and
consistently funny plotline is one of the film's greatest virtues, the most
pleasures lie with the cast of colorful characters.  Standing first and
foremost is the easily excitable Walter, prone to violent outbursts and
suspicious of just about everyone. Goodman, in the film's standout
performance, brings him to life with appropriate bluster without going too
far; he's a blowhard, but he's a very loyal and helpful one, and as such we
understand why anyone would want to be his friend.  Making their marks on a
smaller scale are Julianne Moore, who continues to shine as the perpetually
robe-clad Maude, the Big Lebowski's sophisticated feminist artist daughter;
John Turturro as flamboyant bowling adversary Jesus (_not_ pronounced the
Spanish way) Quintana; Philip Seymour Hoffman as the Big Lebowski's geeky
assistant; and Buscemi, who is endearing, if underused, as the
mild-mannered link in the Dude-Walter-Donny trio.
But what about the Dude?  Out of the odd array of characters in The Big
Lebowski, he is by far the least interesting.  Sure, he's a layabout; he
pays grocery bills for 69 cents by check; he likes drinking White Russians
and smoking a joint here and there; he always looks like he just got of
bed; he loves Creedence Clearwater Revival; and he has vivid fantasies
involving bowling, including one elaborate Busby Berkeley-style musical
number complete with dancers wearing bowling pin headdresses.  He's
certainly not a conventional mystery "investigator" hero, and Bridges
manages to make the slob likable, but he's a downright bore compared to,
say, the vibrantly boorish Walter or even cameo characters such as a giddy
art world contemporary of Maude's played by David Thewlis.
To call The Big Lebowski "strange" or "quirky" would be an understatement;
at times it's flat-out weird.  Its unconventionality (another
understatement) is sure to leave many a moviegoer perplexed, but that's
exactly what makes the film such a fresh and imaginative piece of
entertainment.  (opens March 6)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
CinemaReview Magazine: http://www.CinemaReview.com
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court:
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Steve Buscemi
Synopsis: 
This comedy is about a dope-smoking alcoholic beach bum nicknamed 'the
Dude' (Jeff Bridges). The Dude visits millionaire Jeff Lebowski to talk
about a damaged rug, but Mr. Lebowski gets a wild idea and hires the
Dude as a courier. Lebowski's wife Bunny has just been kidnapped, and
Lebowski needs a guy to drop off the ransom. 
Lebowsky gives the Dude a briefcase to drop off, but unfortunately, it
gets stolen. This leads to a situation where various people come to
punch the Dude's lights out: the angry millionaire Lebowski; Lebowski's
eccentric artist daughter Maude and her thugs; a gang of violent German
musicians, and; a pornography mogul gangster whom Bunny owes money to. 
Aiding the Dude in his quest for peace are two bowling buddies: an
unstable Vietnam veteran named Walter (John Goodman), and a nerd Donny
(Steve Buscemi) who is never allowed to speak his opinion. Will the Dude
guess what happened to Bunny and the money?
Opinion:
Unlike FARGO, which was also directed by Joel and Ethan Coen, THE BIG
LEBOWSKI is a comedy. Basically, the plot is long and pointless as it
takes a backstage to laughs. The film is little more than a showcase for
a continual parade of oddities. For example, the Dude is always wasted
and is hung up on nihilism. Walter is always quoting Vietnam and is big
on Judaism. Maude zooms across the ceiling naked wearing a harness. John
Turturro shows up as a convicted pedophile turned bowler. And so on. The
actors really ham it up. Some parts are funny, but overall the movie
tends to drag. 

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Now I claim what is going on here is that a cowboy without much
respect for the sort of people he finds in Los Angeles, spins the
gull-darnedest yarn about a guy he met in a bar a couple of times.  But
there will probably be other interpretations.
     Jeff Bridges plays a laid-back aging hippie who happens to have
the same name, Jeff Lebowski, as a famous philanthropist, though the
hippie prefers being called The Dude.  That sounds like it could be a
good thing, but the philanthropist has enemies and some of the no-so-
bright ones confuse the two and take their ire out on The Dude.  After
discussing the situation with his close bowling buddies, para-military
Walter Sobchak (a hilarious role for John Goodman) and low-voltage
surfer Donny (Steve Buscemi), The Dude figures there is nothing he can
do but face the Big Lebowski (David Huddlestone).  The Big Lebowski at
first has little use for someone with The Dude's marginal life-style,
but he finds a use when his wife is kidnapped and he needs someone to
drop off the million-dollar ransom.  The Dude wants to play it
straight, but Sobchak figures if they play their cards right he and The
Dude could split the million.
     Only the Coen Brothers could tell a story this complicated, this
weird, and with so many characters on so many different frequencies.
The film is full of weirdoes, many of whom are present only to add
texture. John Tuturro, missing from films for a while, plays the
totally superfluous role of Jesus, the bowling rival of our heroes.
The over-ripe Jesus practically dances a flamenco every time he throws
the ball.  Then their are the nihilist bikers.  And if the script does
not add enough weird characters, the character you think you know get
weirder and weirder.
     Raymond Chandler used to add a touch of the surreal to his mystery
stories whenever his detective was knocked out by telling us Marlowe's
dreams while he was unconscious.  But then Philip Marlowe was only an
amateur at hallucinating.  He was not a stoned-out hippie like The
Dude.  Conk The Dude on the bean and you get weird bowling dreams that
are worth the price of admission by themselves.  The Coen Brothers have
incredible visual imagination and tremendous good humor.  Comedies of
late have been mild smile- along-with-Sandra-Bullock sorts of things.
The only recent film that made me laugh out loud recently was MIDNIGHT
IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL.  But it has been a good while since I
have laughed as hard as I did at THE BIG LEBOWSKI.  The only real
problem with the script is the plot lacks a strong finish.  After a
strong first and second act, the film has a much lower-key third act
that resolves the mystery but lacks the strength and the humor of the
first two.  The film needed a wild finish and goes soft and sentimental
at the wrong time.
     This is a film that has great visuals and has genuine laugh-out-
loud humor.  If it has a weak spot it is only that the story is just
okay, but that is not really the point.  I rate it 8 on the 0 to 10
scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Ryan Davis
        Usually a movie is about something more than a soiled rug,  but not THE
BIG LEBOWSKI.  The new offering from the creators of 1996's critical hit
FARGO, is to say the least, wildly entertaining. Originality has always
been a strong trait in the Coen Brother's movies, and THE BIG LEBOWSKI is
insanely original.  
        It begins oddly enough when Jeff "The Dude" Lebowski(Jeff Bridges) is
mistaken for a millionaire, Jeff "The Big" Lebowski(David Huddleston),
who's wife, Bunny(Tara Reid) owes money all over town. Two goons,  out to
collect on Bunny's debt break into Dude's house. They attempt to collect
the money that Bunny owes them and one of them urinates on his rug. The
next day Dude explains his situation to his bowling team(Steve Buscemi &
John Goodman, respectively.) He is advised to go to the Big Lebowski and
get him to pay for the defiled rug.  He does this, and shortly after gets
tied up in a kidnapping caper. 
        This is a extremely funny movie with lots of belly laugh moments. The Coen
brothers have assembled a great cast that play off each other perfectly.
Also several great supporting roles, John Turturro as a child molesting
bowler named Jesus. The Coen's script plays off perfectly and it all goes
together to make it extremely entertaining. I doubt this movie will be
nearly as popular as FARGO, but its off the wall moments make it so far the
best of 1998. If you like anything else the Coen brothers have done you
will love this one, if not they give this one a try its a little different.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Gramercy Pictures/PolyGram
 Director:  Joel Coen, Ethan Coen
 Writer:  Joe Coen, Ethan Coen
 Cast: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, David
Huddleston, Tara Reid, Ben Gazzara, Flea, Sam Elliott, Steve
Buscemi, Jon Polito, Peter Stormare, John Turturro
   In their uniquely idiosyncratic style, the Coen Brothers take
on the issue, "What is the state of American civilization
today," offering gems of insight that would make even Max
Lerner proud.  Or, as John Goodman in the role of the Polish
Catholic character Walter Sobchak suggests pessimistically
enough, what has become of "3000 years of Jewish
civilization from Moses to Sandy Koufax?"  (As in "Barton
Fink," another creation of the Coen brothers, "The Big
Lebowski" is most promising when John Goodman is on the
screen.)
   It's not that "The big Lebowski" is a tightly structured work
delving into the essence of life.  Quite the contrary.  "The Big
Lebowski," which features Mr. Goodman is a broadly diverting
role and Jeff Bridges in a luminary performance as the
picture's eponymous character, has hardly a plot at all.  Then
again, story line is not important, taking a back seat to a
series of Saturday-Night-Live type sketches which work far
more often than not, sending up our use of language as a
means of avoiding connection, noting our inclination to root
ourselves in the norms of the era in which we grew up rather
than in the present, and celebrating genres of Hollywood
moviemaking particularly the noir, which has been enjoying
quite a revival of late.  
   When you note that Ethan Coen did Philosophy at
Princeton and his brother Joel studied film at N.Y.U., you can
better appreciate where this movie is coming from.  Sharing a
platform more with the Coen Brothers' critical washout "The
Hudsucker Proxy" than with their considerably more
successful "Fargo," "The Big Lebowski" is philosophy with a
Mel Brooks bent and a visual sense which manipulates both
current movie technology and Freudian rhapsodizing. 
Substance is minimized: style rules.  If that doesn't bother
you, prepare for over two hours of good, albeit largely
sophomoric, fun.
   The picture centers on Jeff Lebowski, aka Dude (Jeff
Bridges), a laid-back, unemployed Californian. Dude's idea of
culture is a 1960s mentality complete with an occasional toke
on the weed, a relaxed mode of dress emphasizing baggy
shorts and ulta-casual shirts, and an almost religious
dedication to the bowling alley where he competes in
tournaments with his buddies Walter (Goodman) and Donny
(Steve Buscemi).  The narrative--such as it is--is propelled
when a case of mistaken identity sends two goons to
Lebowski's shabby Venice digs to collect a debt allegedly
owed by his trophy wife, Bunny (Tara Reid).  But the ruffians
haven't a clue that the man they should be after is the other
Lebowski (David Huddleston), a rah-rah, achievement-
oriented tycoon confined to a wheelchair because of an injury
he received in Korea, contemptuous of anyone who has not
been able to "make it" in our society.  
   Hired by the rich old man to act as courier of ransom
money to kidnappers who have reportedly taken Bunny into
their custody, Dude is conned by his friend Walter into double
dealing, a plan to keep the million in payoffs for themselves. 
Meeting the old man's daughter Maude (Julianne Moore),
Dude gets an education in erotic artistry, is introduced to a
porno publishing supplier (Ben Gazzara). Subjected to
episodes of beatings and in one case the victim of a spiked
version of his favorite drink, the White Russian, he submits to
a series of wildly adventurous dreams involving his flying
through the air in a variety of circumstances.
   The Coen brothers have even more fun with their dialogue
than with the imaginative visuals, making fine use of the talent
of John Turturro as a macho pederast who frequently
threatens the buddies and a trio of so-called nihilists who act
as the kidnappers, demanding ransom whether or not they
actually committed the abduction.  Some audience awareness
of the pop California culture of the 90s would be helpful to
appreciate the Coens' ripostes on performance artists and the
ways in which we delude ourselves regardless of education,
cultural and religious background, and the nature of
humankind.  Jeff Bridges shines in every scene as a modern
Everyman ironically put into situations that defy his relaxed
outlook on life in a film that may be instantly forgettable but
should keep you grinning for a couple of hours.
Rated R.  Running Time: 127 minutes.  (C) 1998 Harvey
Karten

Author
Derek Miner
I suppose I'm asking for trouble when I have to take issue with a Coen
Brothers film. Sure, there have always been those who don't like their
work, but it hardly seems to matter what criticisms are launched when you
"get it." Take, for instance, "The Hudsucker Proxy" which I found to be a
highly enjoyable, inventively surreal, lovingly crafted parable. I was
(and still am) awestruck at the critical trashing that film took. So here
I am, a traitor to the ranks, I suppose, because I just didn't "get" "The
Big Lebowski"
The film starts curiously enough, promising to be some sort of urban
legend, paralleling the old west with early-90s Los Angeles. We meet "the
Dude" (Jeff Bridges) -- Jeff Lebowski number one, slacker extraordinaire,
whose prized living room rug is soiled by some punks who are actually
after a _different_ Jeff Lebowski. That Lebowski (David Huddleston)
appears to be a rich man who ends up using the Dude to help recover his
kidnapped trophy-wife. The Dude is much more interested in bowling with
his pals (John Goodman and Steve Buscemi), but trouble (in the form of
Nihillists and assorted other wackos) just won't leave him alone.
"The Big Lebowski" begins with such promise. The bowling alley credit
sequence is one of the most absurdly funny things I've ever seen. Our
characters (for the most part) seem so honestly part of their reality, you
feel like _something_ amazing will happen. But it never does. After an
hour and a half, I was desperately waiting for the tangents of this film
to converge in some sensible, if absurd or ironic, way. I forgave the
lapses between humorous parts becuase I sensed it was all going somewhere,
and at the end of the ride I would understand. By the time the end credits
rolled, however, I felt cheated. I say "cheated" because it always seemed
possible (and likely) that the non-existent payoff was around the bend
from the next plot twist. By the time the film edged over the two hour
mark, it seemed like the plot just twisted away into nothingness and they
forgot to let us in on that fact.
At times in "The Big Lebowski," I marvelled at just how much guts the
Coens had to pull off what I saw up on the screen. I laughed heartily
several times. But even gutsy, original work needs some kind of anchor,
something to bring home the humanity of the story. That's why a cheap,
sloppy film like "Clerks" works so well whereas a slickly produced
festival entry can fail because the characters and writing don't resonate.
Even with quirkiness to spare, "The Big Lebowski" has all the character
resonance of a whoopie cushion. The bowling alley talks (if you could call
them that) shared between the Dude and bowling pals seem forced and
unfunny. These friends seem to hate each other, and their conversations
are so rude, you hope that someone (preferably our main character, The
Dude) will realize this and just move on. But The Dude doesn't seem any
the better at the end of his journey, and neither does anyone else, for
that matter.
I've read several reviews of this film, and every one of them has been
ready to praise "The Big Lebowski" despite it's flaws. So until someone
lets me in on what I didn't "get," I'll just go back to enjoying "Fargo"
and "The Hudsucker Proxy" at home, where it's safe.

Author
John Roberdeau
For those who consider themselves fans (or perhaps scholars) of the Coen
brothers' work, this movie could perhaps be somewhat of a disappointment --
not because it isn't absolutely incredible, but because        I think it's more
accessible and (though still noticably Coenian) less, shall we say,
"quirky".
Anyway, I think that 85% of the critics' problems with this movie can be
attributed to the success of "Fargo".  I really wasn't much of a fan of
"Fargo", but it seems that I am pretty much the only person who can honestly
say that.  I think my point is that you shouldn't go into this movie
expecting "Fargo" (or "Raising Arizona" or "Millers Crossing" or "Barton
Fink").  Where most of their other movies have humor that sort of peeks out
from under a bunch of violence or weirdness or both, "The Big Lebowski" is a
great deal more straightforward.  Don't get me wrong, the film is actually
quite confusing -- just not that weird.
The movie is about a middle aged, unemployed, pot-smoking, White Russian
drinking fellow who calls himself "The Dude" and was, according        to the
interview included on the DVD, based on a friend of the Coen brothers, which
I found interesting.  It's the laid back attitude of "The Dude" that is the
basis for most of the humor in the movie.  Whether he's saying "Hey,
careful,
man, there's a beverage here!" as someone muscles him into the back seat of
a car or trying to placate Walter (John Goodman), his friend and bowling
partner who pulls a gun on the lanes, it's The Dude's drug-induced calm that
makes you laugh.
The only thing about the movie that I really am not fond of is the presence
of a couple of small musical numbers.  Fortunately, they are easily
overlooked
and don't hurt the movie to a great extent.  In        closing, try the movie if

Author
Chris Simpson
Directed by Joel Coen
Written by Ethan & Joel Coen
Starring Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi
About six months ago, I was in the cinema watching the trailers for
upcoming movies. There was the usual complement of five, and they had
one thing in common -- they were all previewing remakes or sequels.
There was not one original idea between them. Add to that the "reverse
spin-off" movies from TV shows (I won't pass judgement on "Lost In
Space" or "The X-Files" yet, but "Sanford and Son"?  Puh-leeze!), the
alarming number of cases of two movies being made from the same
material (Steve Prefontaine, volcanoes, the Dalai Lama, earthbound
comets) and Miramax's interest in resurrecting the "Rambo" franchise
and you've got to wonder what things are going to be like in a few
years' time. So it's in this atmosphere that it's good to see the
refreshing and always-original Coen brothers follow up "Fargo", a movie
about an unusual quasi-kidnapping, with "The Big Lebowski", a movie
about...an unusual quasi-kidnapping.
OK, so the similarity may pretty much end with that sentence, but given
that this is hardly a genre that's flooding the cineplexes, it's all a
bit unnerving. So much so that "Fargo" was always in the back of my
mind, which was a shame since "The Big Lebowski", while undoubtedly
better than most current movies, compares unfavourably to that earlier
picture.
Jeff Bridges plays Jeff Lebowski, known as "Dude", a pot-smoking
neo-hippie who returns from a bowling game with his friends Walter
(John Goodman, who spends the entire movie shouting) and Donny (Steve
Buscemi, in a ridiculously small role) to find two goons in his
apartment demanding payment for debts run up by his wife. The goons are
actually looking for another Jeff Lebowski (the "big" one of the title,
played by David Huddleston), but being typical goons, they fail to
realize that the Dude's abode is far removed from the opulence of their
millionaire targets, and by the time they realize this one of them has
already urinated on the Dude's rug. Walter persuades the Dude to try to
get some compensation from the Big Lebowski and it is this meeting
which causes the Dude to be brought in as a courier when the richer
Lebowski's young wife disappears and a ransom note is received. Things
of course do not run smoothly and typical Coen brothers mayhem ensues.
So, what's wrong with this picture? Well, while the collection of
subplots and dream sequences usually succeed by themselves, as a whole
they lack cohesion and the movie feels disjointed. Earlier Coen
brothers movies got their delightfully surreal nature predominantly
from the premise, but in "The Big Lebowski" it is the characters who
provide the surreality via a collection of unusual traits, and this
melting pot of bizarreness fails to produce the overall feel possessed
by their previous movies. The movie does have some great scenes,
however, especially those featuring John Turturro as a bowler on a
rival team, and invites frequent laughter, but ultimately it's not up
to the consistent standards of the Coens. That doesn't mean it's a bad
movie, since these standards are high, but it will be a disappointment
to many fans of Joel and Ethan's work.
Also look out for the brief screen debut of singer/songwriter Aimee
Mann as the girlfriend of one of the three German nihilists, and the
motion sickness-inducing camera shot looking out through the
fingerholes of a bowling ball during one of the dream sequences.

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) I've never been a huge fan of Jeff Bridges, but I loved
him in THE BIG LEBOWSKI. The part of Jeff "The Dude" Lebowski was reportedly
written specifically with Bridges in mind, and the fit is perfect. 
The Dude is an unemployed denizen of Los Angeles, a hippie slob on a bowling
team with a soft spot for white russians. He's enjoying a leisurely soak in
the tub when two thugs break into his apartment demanding to be paid for the
money his wife owes. After much pleading he convinces them they have the
wrong guy, but not before they urinate on his rug. 
The Dude assumes that these "collection agents" were after another Jeff
Lebowski, a famous millionaire who also lives in L.A. so he goes to meet his
namesake to ask for enough money to replace his rug. 
The millionaire refuses, but calls him back when he discovers his wife has
been kidnaped. He wants The Dude to act as go-between for the kidnapers.
Dude and his friend Walter (John Goodman) take on the task, and get caught
in an intricate web of kidnapers, millionaires, high schoolers, nihilists,
artists, pornographers, thugs, and league bowlers. 
Comedy is perhaps the most subjective of genres, so take my recommendation
as you will: for me, THE BIG LEBOWSKI is very funny. It is an incredibly
successful comedy, the ratio of laughs to intended jokes much higher than in
most films. Not only are the two leads (Bridges and Goodman) funny
separately and together, but each supporting character is a refreshing comic
figure. 
All the characters end up as the butt of jokes, but the jokes are always
deserved and never contrived. Each person may be a comic caricature, but
there is always a respectful self-acceptance that lets us laugh at these
people without condescension. The characters are firmly established, and
they never change their behavior for a quick, cheap laugh. It's not what
they DO that's funny, it's who they are, which is why the acting is so
important, and so successful, in this movie. 
Worth mentioning are John Turturro as Jesus (that's JEE-zus, not hay-SOOS),
the greaser bowler who's in a lusty marriage with the game; Julianne Moore
as the post-post-feminist artist whose work has been described as "vaginal;"
Steve Buscemi as the eager tagalong bowler who is constantly rebuked and
ignored by teammates Dude and Walter; and Sam Elliott as the rambling,
long-winded narrator. 
Aside from the performances, what makes all the characters funny and
interesting is the astute dialogue. People lose trains of thought, they
interrupt, they boast, they repeat themselves, they repeat their friends...
they sound natural. Taken with FARGO, the Coen Brothers' last film, it is
evidence that the brothers are observant listeners and gifted writers. 
Ethan Coen is not just good at directing actors, he's also good at technical
directing. He and cinematographr Roger Deakins created a beautiful world on
film. Perhaps "beautiful" is the wrong word; nihilists, carpet-pissers and
thugs are not objects of beauty. But the bowling photography and a series of
viking/bowling fantasy dream sequences are lovingly photographed, as though
The Dude himself were in charge of immortalizing them on film. 
All around, THE BIG LEBOWSKI is great, solid comedy. Outstanding acting,
writing, direction and photography all combine to make this a great comic
success.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Chuck Dowling
THE BIG LEBOWSKI (1998)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Cast: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi, David
Huddleston, John Turturro, Sam Elliott, Peter Stormare, Flea, Ben Gazarra,
Phillip Seymore Hoffman, Tara Reid
Written by: Joel and Ethan Coen
Directed by: Joel Coen
Running Time: 119 minutes
My Rating: ***** out of *****
After critic Gene Siskel saw the Coen brothers' 1996 film "Fargo" he
remarked that he would not see a better picture that year.  I thought that
was a pretty bold statement considering how early in the year the film was
released.  Well, here it is the first week of March, the Coen brothers
have released their latest film "The Big Lebowski," and I have to say, in
the words of Gene Siskel: I will not see a better film this year.
To describe the plot of "The Big Lebowski" would be pointless, as it's
just not something able to be described.  Jeff Bridges plays Jeff Lebowski
aka "The Dude," a hippie who gets mixed up in a case of mistaken identity
with a millionaire (David Huddleston), also named Jeff Lebowski.  What
follows includes kidnapping, ransom, auto theft, bowling, musical dance
numbers, former german rock stars, bad pornography, and more comedy than
ten movies usually have.
The Coen brothers, responsible for such wondeful motion pictures as
"Fargo," "The Hudsucker Proxy," "Raising Arizona," "Barton Fink," and
"Blood Simple" always succeed in creating their own little universe on the
movie screen, and with "The Big Lebowski" they certainly succeed again. 
How they have managed to maintain their creative filmmaking and
storytelling abilities, and now manage to TOP all their previous works is
beyond me.  But I am so glad that they have.
I usually try to avoid grand, sweeping statements when I write reviews,
but in the case of "The Big Lebowski" I just can't help it.  Without a
doubt, "The Big Lebowski" is the funniest film I have ever seen.  For the
entire running time of the film, I was constantly laughing.  Yes, that's
right.  I laughed for 119 minutes.  Never once during the 1am screening I
attended did I glance at my watch, and not once did I yawn or take my eyes
off the screen.  While the film ran I never wanted it to end, and when it
was over I wanted them to run it again.  If I was to give out the Oscars,
acting awards would go to all involved (particularly Bridges, Goodman, and
Buscemi, who's dialogue and chemistry with one another is fantastic),
along with awards for writing, directing, production design, music...
everything.  And a note to the Coen brothers: I want a sequel.  I want
more of these characters, and I want it as soon as possible.
Now I realize that comedy is a tricky thing, and that everyone has a
slightly different sense of humor.  And the comedy in "The Big Lebowski"
isn't necessarily jokes, set-ups, and punch lines.  It's dialogue and
attitudes, much like the comedic elements of "Pulp Fiction".
Certainly some of you will see the film and afterwards think that I am
completely insane.  So here's a little test to help you see if you'll go
along with the comedy of the film.  In the early seconds of the film, The
Dude writes a check for a ridiculously low amount of money, something like
$.68.  I found that to be absolutely hilarious.  If you would too, then
"The Big Lebowski" is right up your alley.  It's the best film of the year
so far, and I seriously doubt there will be anything better.  [R]

Author
Jamie Peck
Gramercy / 1:50 / 1998 / R (violence, language, glimpses of nudity, drug use)
Cast: Jeff Bridges; John Goodman; Julianne Moore; Steve Buscemi; David 
Huddleston; Peter Stormare; Tara Reid; Philip Seymour Hoffman; Flea; John 
Turturro; Sam Elliott 
Director: Joel Coen 
Screenplay: Ethan Coen; Joel Coen 
You know you're in for a truly different cinematic experience the moment you 
realize Steve Buscemi has been cast as the movie in question's most normal 
character. Such is the case with "The Big Lebowski," Joel and Ethan Coen's 
first venture since their "Fargo" nabbed nationwide acclaim and a mantlepiece 
of Academy Award nods. There's no need to fear that the Coens suffered 
creative burnout with that accomplishment, because "Lebowski" is an effort 
that makes words like "strange" and "unusual" seem like an understatement. 
Thanks in part to delicious characterization and an all-encompassing sense of 
humor, the film is a smashing success. 
The central oddball here is the Dude (Jeff Bridges), an unemployed cad whose 
ambitions appear to be zilch beyond smoking pot, drinking beer and going 
bowling (are you college students already rooting for him, or what?). One 
night, a pair of thugs break into his house and pee on his carpet, a 
threatening act that's supposed to be carried out against a famous Pasadena 
millionaire (David Huddleston) who shares his birth name -- Jeff Lebowski -- 
with the Dude. Once the Dude realizes this coincidence, he visits the Big 
Lebowski in hopes to claim reparations for his soiled rug, and is back to his 
normal life with alley pals Walter (John Goodman), a hotheaded Vietnam vet, 
and Donny (Buscemi), a mild-mannered surfer, before too long. 
Soon, though, Lebowski's trampy trophy wife Bunny (Tara Reid) is kidnaped and 
held for a hefty ransom, and he turns to the Dude for help. It seems Bunny's 
troubles are related to a line of work she's kept secret from her husband -- 
she's actually an adult film star and is very in debt with a shady producer 
named Jackie Treehorn. The Dude, now on Lebowski's payroll, accepts the offer 
and agrees to handle the money drop; Walter tags along and insists that the 
Dude keep the cash for himself. Chaos obviously ensues, and the Dude 
eventually finds himself in hot water with cops, crooks and Lebowski's 
ultra-eccentric artist daughter Maude (Julianne Moore). 
"The Big Lebowski" deserves to win the Coens the same amount of acclaim that 
"Fargo" did; while that 1996 black comedy was certainly a better film, 
"Lebowski" is at least as breathtakingly imaginative. The movie boasts a 
mile-high absurdity level that sometimes threatens to topple over, but 
thankfully never does. The Coens (Joel directed, Ethan produced and both 
wrote) keep you in stitches as they unravel their exceedingly loopy tale, and 
must be commended for juggling a number of people and subplots one would 
expect to find in a Robert Altman flick. Whether we're watching Bridges fend 
off a marmet in his bathtub or Moore don Viking duds and dance in a Busby 
Berkeley-esque dream sequence, "The Big Lebowski" is immensely lively. There 
are those who will dislike this film, but not because it's boring. 
The cast has a great deal of fun with the bounteous material they're given. 
Bridges exudes a likeable, surprisingly sweet presence; his Dude sure isn't 
the cleanest guy around, but you'd still follow him to another movie. Goodman 
merits 1998's first Oscar consideration, as Walter's manic temper is one of 
"The Big Lebowski"'s many highlights; the same goes for Moore, whose throaty, 
delectable performance as Maude is a hilarious hoot. John Turturro may very 
well steal the movie with his two scenes as a colorful bowler from a rival 
faction. Sam Elliott's rambling narration gets the film off to a solid start. 
And some will recognize Peter Stormare -- "Fargo"'s silent heavy -- as Carl 
Hungus, a porn star who's really a samurai sword-wielding German nihilist and 
has-been pop star. 
Only in its final third does the movie falter, with a couple of loose plot 
threads and some cast members who quickly disappear and never emerge for a 
curtain call. These flaws are forgivable, though -- the Coens have crafted a 
tale so rich with personality that it's hard to look at the final product 
with anything but a big grin on your face. Without a doubt, "The Big 
Lebowski" is the best film so far this year. Sure, we're only three months in 
and the competition ("Deep Rising," "Desperate Measures," "The Wedding 
Singer," etc.) has been pretty bland, but it's still the gospel truth. Maybe 
during next awards season, "Lebowski" won't be a far cry from "Fargo." 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE BIG LEBOWSKI
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi,
David Huddleston, Peter Stormare, Tara Reid, Philip Seymour Hoffman.
Screenplay:  Joel Coen and Ethan Coen.
Producer:  Ethan Coen.
Director:  Joel Coen.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     God bless the Coen brothers, the film critic's best friends.  While
the grinding predictability of most American films challenges a writer to
generate one more coherent thought than the film itself, Coen efforts like
MILLER'S CROSSING, BARTON FINK and FARGO burst from the screen like
doctoral theses waiting to be written, sending cinema scribes scrambling
gleefully for a thesaurus.  The bizarre supporting characters pinwheeling
through their films could be glossed as metaphorical proto-fascists or
subversions of traditional genre types; their apparently
stream-of-conscious narratives could reveal clockwork structure.  Oh, what
happy hours could be spent fine tuning analyses fit for literary journals
as we hurtled towards our deadlines.
     I spent most of the car ride home from THE BIG LEBOWSKI -- and a fair
chunk of time afterward -- spelunking for themes, tropes and symbols.  The
time frame of Gulf War-era 1991 was certainly meant to place the story
squarely in the twilight of the Reagan/Bush go-go 1980s.  The backbone of
the plot, meanwhile, found inveterate 40-something layabout stoner Jeff
"The Dude" Lebowski (Jeff Bridges) and his blustering Vietnam-vet pal
Walter (John Goodman) mixed up in a convoluted kidnapping plot after the
Dude is mistaken for _another_ Jeff Lebowski (David Huddleston), this one
a wealthy philanthropist with a debt-ridden former porno star (Tara Reid)
for a trophy wife.  Mix in the "Big" Lebowski's feminist avant-garde
artiste daughter Maude (Julianne Moore), ironic allusions to political
correctness and a few swipes at the boot-straps rhetoric of the
well-to-do, and clearly you have a satire of the ordinary Joe (or Jeff)
unwittingly fighting to make the world safe for Republicanism.  Right?
     It was so much fun deconstructing THE BIG LEBOWSKI after the fact
that I started trying to convince myself I had had as much fun watching
it.  The reason it's not more fun, despite a blissful singularity of
vision which always keeps you watching, is that the Coens seem to take the
same approach to making their films that we critics take to analyzing
them.  They're not stories as much as they are intellectual and aesthetic
calistheics, films which make you work hard enough that you have to
convince yourself you're getting something out of them.  Joel and Ethan's
encyclopedic knowledge of genre conventions and film expectations allow
them to understand exactly when to yank the rug, but in THE BIG LEBOWSKI
they fall into the same trap which hampered THE HUDSUCKER PROXY:  they
create so much distance from the characters that you're left with
congratulating yourself because you got the joke.
     If you're willing to surrender yourself to the Coens' characteristic
oddball flourishes, you certainly won't walk away from THE BIG LEBOWSKI
disgusted.  Second-tier Coen fare is still better than most of what's
out there; it's hard not to take some pleasure in a film which includes
among its antagonists a trio of marmot-wielding nihilists, or clothes a
meek bowling buddy named Donny (Steve Buscemi) in a succession of bowling
shirts bearing every possible name _but_ Donny.  Jeff Bridges also has
great fun as The Dude, trying to wrap his fried brain around "clues" as he
attempts to figure out exactly what's going on.  It's just disappointing
watching the Coens retreat into layers of irony once you've seen what
happens in a film like FARGO when they're willing to humanize their
phenomenal film-making talent.  As undeniably amusing as many of THE BIG
LEBOSWKI's oddball flourishes are, the film is almost nothing _but_ 
oddball flourishes, wandering along with a theme or two in tow.  Bad news
for those in search of accessible comedy; good news, as always, for those
who work at finding oddball flourishes and well-disguised social
commentary.

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **** (out of 4 = excellent)
1998, R, 117 minutes [1 hour, 57 minutes]
starring: Jeff Bridges (Jeff "The Dude" Lebowski), John Goodman (Walter),
Julianne Moore (Maude Lebowski), Steve Buscemi (Donny); written by Joel and
Ethan Coen; produced by Ethan Coen; directed by Joel Coen.
Seen March 5, 1998 at 7:30 p.m. at the Crossgates Mall Cinema 18 (Guilderland,
NY), theater #2, by myself, for free using a promotional advanced screening
pass. [Theater rating: ****: excellent picture, sound, and seats]
        Perhaps one of the greatest feelings one can experience while watching a film
is realizing how complex the story is and yet how easy it is to follow. It
takes a lot of effort and craftsmanship to construct a screenplay and film it
in such a way as to give the viewer this experience, therefore it's no
surprise "The Big Lebowski," which epitomizes this concept, is delivered to us
by veteran filmmakers Ethan and Joel Coen. 
        From film to film the Coen brothers never fail to top themselves by making
their stories more bizarre and/or complicated, and yet still very enjoyable.
Just describing the basic elements that make up this film would prove this
idea as it manages to combine bowling, kidnapping, two wars, sadomasochist
art, pornography, washed-up rock stars, and many other things. But what's most
amazing is the fact the film is essentially a straight comedy, and yet an
intricate web of mystery, all strung together through a script chiseled to
perfection.
        Jeff Bridges stars as Jeffrey Lebowski - an L.A. roundabout who always seems
to be in his pajamas, whether he's bowling at the local lanes or smoking weed
in his apartment (that's about all he does). Lebowski hates his name and
prefers to be called "The Dude," and calls everyone else "Man," just like a
hippies (apparently, he hasn't been able to get over the 1960s). The film's
first joke perfectly establishes his character in just a few moments time as
we see him buy a quart of half & half at the supermarket by writing a check
for $0.68.
        Within a matter of minutes a conflict and plot are quickly thrown into the
mix as The Dude is mistaken for another Lebowski by slow-witted bookies who
have mistaken him for a millionaire by the same name (hence the film's title).
When one of the thugs "soils" his rug a hilarious scene of dialogue between
The Dude, and his raving Vietnam vet friend Walter (Goodman) and always-two-
steps-behind friend  Donnie (Buscemi) ensues. Immediately the atmosphere of
minute details is present as we are able to get a reading on these characters
and their situations through their conversations alone. Bridges is great, but
it is Goodman who is surprisingly affective here - always making for comedy
simply through attitude, not one-liners or slapstick.
        Soon the plot becomes complicated as The Dude get mixed up in the kidnapping
of The Big Lebowski's wife, as he is asked to deliver the money to the
kidnappers, but his efforts are hindered when Walter decides to help him out.
>From this point on the story keeps twisting and turning and never ceases to
surprise us in where it goes. Things never go according to plan in crime
movies, especially crime comedies, and The Dude is thrown from one strange
situation to another.
        If ever there was an example of the genus to this film's script, and to the
Coens in general, it would be how the film transitions itself from conflict to
conflict and even scene to scene. At no point in the film is it possible to
predict where it will go next, even the aforementioned examples of plot
devices would not act as spoilers. And what's most amazing is not just that
said examples could be used together, but that they are done so in such
original, enjoyable manners that anything less extraordinary would seem
incorrect.
        But it is not just the terrific scripting to the film that makes it great, it
is its comedic elements and outstanding acting which executes the script
flawlessly. Bridges and Goodman are both outstanding as they never kill their
character's personalities even when they say and do the same things over and
over again. Both are able to turn generic slapstick bits and the occasional
one-liners into fresh forms of comedy.
        "The Big Lebowski" is a film so grand on every level, it's almost frustrating
in trying to evaluate it for fear of over-looking elements. Still, it is
filmmaking at its best as every subplot, every scene, even every individual
line of dialogue and camera angle have meaning here, absolutely nothing is
wasted nor gratuitous. 

Author
David Kerr
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi
1998, R, 115 minutes
The Coen Brothers latest offering is sure to please fans of their older
works, especially Raising Arizona.  Directed by Joel Coen, produced by
Ethan Coen, and created by both, this is the team that brought last
year's smash Fargo.
I liked Fargo, but The Big Lebowski is not like Fargo at all, except for
that ol' Coen Brothers style.  Everything that the Coens have done has
been wierd and over the top, and The Big Lebowski is no exception.
The story is about The Dude (Jeff Bridges) who comes home one fateful
day to find two thugs awaiting to collect money from one Jeff Lebowski. 
After roughing up The Dude a bit and urinating on his carpet, the thugs
realize that they have the wrong guy. The Dude's name is Jeff Lebowski,
but there are two Jeff Lebowskis and the one they want is supposed to be
a millionaire living in a mansion.
The Dude is upset over his carpet.  "It was the centerpiece of the
apartment" exclaims his veteran bowling buddy Walter (John Goodman). 
The Dude wants compensation for his rug, but when he asks for it he gets
much more than he bargained for.  He is drawn into a web of deciet,
lies, kidnappings, car chases, feminism, porn movies, and nihilism.
And in the midst of all this chaos, The Dude is relaxed.  He is the
"laziest man in Los Angle-ees" explains narrator Sam Niell.  After an
afternoon of madness, The Dude returns to his bowling tournament, with
partners Walter and Donny (Steve Buscemi).
This movie isn't a laugh fest, although there are a few instances of
extreme craziness that push the viewer over the edge.  One scene comes
to mind, when The Dude is decoding a secret message that turns out to be
a rude drawing.  I don't want to give it away, but it is quite funny,
and for some reason reminded me of a line from The Long Kiss Goodnight.
What is the point of this movie?  Glad you asked.  I am not really
sure.  As far as I can make out, this is just a week in the life of The
Dude.  The Dude gets a rabid marmet thrown on him while taking a bath
and doesn't think much of it.  He goes  bowling, and returns home to the
chaos.  The Dude isn't a nihilist, but the ultimate message is nihilism
- who cares?  Nothing really matters in this movie.  The Dude is a poke
and prod kinda guy who reacts to external stimuli.  Ironically the
nihilist gang members are the most concerned about their welfare in this
movie.
As Homer J. Simpson said, there is no moral of the show, it is "just a
bunch of stuff that happened".  Relax, sit back, and watch.  Unlike
movies where this is the case  because the movie has no substance, this
film is deliberately made to be nothing more than a set of events.
I have to say I enjoyed this movie, but it is definitely not for all
tastes.  Watch Raising Arizona before seeing this.  If you loved it,
you'll at least be in for a treat with the Big Lebowski.  I liked it,
but I can't say I'm dying to go see it again.  I got my money's worth,
which is a good thing these days.  Besides, it's worth it to see Peter
Stormare play a porno star... if only for a few hilarious seconds.

Author
Andy Wright
Capsule Review:
    After a brief and somewhat disconcerting flirtation with the =
conventional, FARGO creators and supreme weisenheimers Joel & Ethan Coen =
have returned to the fringe big time with this, their loosest film to =
date. A radically disheveled Jeff Bridges headlines as the titular Dude, =
a hazy bowling obsessed slacker who gets reluctantly drawn into the =
Coens' favorite plot device - a haywire kidnapping scheme. It's a =
tantalizing setup - THE BIG SLEEP with Jeff Spicoli instead of Philip =
Marlowe - but the film never really builds on it, preferring instead to =
dance around the edges and introduce as many wacky characters (including =
ace performances by Coen mainstays John Goodman, John Turturro, and an =
underutilized Steve Buscemi) and absurd situations as it possibly can.
    Although there are plenty of laughs to be had, what ultimately makes =
this film feel like a minor effort is the lack of the tightly coiled =
(albeit noticeably bent) internal logic that governed the duo's previous =
efforts and which made even the goofiest scenes seem connected with the =
narrative as a whole; this is the first of their movies that feels like =
it was pretty much being made up as it went along.
    While longtime fans will find much to savor amid the mess =
(particularly Goodman's superb performance and an awesomely gonzo =
musical dance sequence), LEBOWSKI isn't likely to satisfy the mainstream =
audience that jumped aboard the bandwagon with FARGO - and that just =
might be the Coens' biggest and best joke of all.=20
Copyright 1998 by The Critic formerly known as Andrew Wright
For more insanely biased reviews, check out http://www.seanet.com/~louk/
e-mail louk@seanet.com

Author
Christopher Null
     It bears repeating: Just because you happen to make an amazing,
perfectly-crafted, wildly funny movie (FARGO), doesn't mean you can do
whatever the hell you want in your follow-up and pass it off as art.
     THE BIG LEBOWSKI is the definitive answer to skeptics like me who
wondered if FARGO was the fluke, and ho-hum flicks like THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
and RAISING ARIZONA were more the norm for the Coen brothers.  They
undoubtedly are.  In THE BIG LEBOWSKI, the Coens had the world to play with
as a palette.  What they delivered is a wreck.
     The story, what little there is of one, follows Jeff "The Dude"
Lebowski (Bridges), a bum/amateur bowler who gets caught up in a
kidnapping-gone-wrong scheme involving a millionaire who happens to have the
same name.  Promising premise (even if it sounds familiar...), but the story
is totally blown on one-dimensional goofball characters, blind side plots
that go nowhere, and a meandering plotline that barely keeps you awake.
     Sure, with characters like Goodman's Vietnam vet/wacked-out bowling
buddy, Moore's new age "vaginal" artist, and, most memorably, John
Turturro's minuscule role as Jesus, the most flamboyant bowler alive, there
is plenty to be amused by in the film, and sometimes it's absolutely
riotous.  But the laughs are hollow... because the story just sits there
like a 7-10 split.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Michael Redman
The relaxed Dude rides a roller coaster
The most surreal situations are ordinary everyday life as viewed by an
outsider. When those observers are Joel and Ethan Coen, the surreal becomes
bizarre. When the life is that of Jeff "The Dude" Leboswki, the bizarre falls
over the edge into the world of "What'sgoingonaroundhere".
The marvelous sound of  "The Stranger" (Sam Elliot)'s voice-over introduces
the film. At least it does until he forgets what he was going to say and gives
up.  The Dude (Jeff Bridges) is described as the "laziest man in Los Angeles,
possibly the world", although he's not so much slothful as he is relaxed. 
Spending the last 30 years with a roach clip in one hand and a White Russian
in the other, he doesn't have much of a life, but he's having a good time.
When asked what he does for fun, he responds "bowl, drive around and the
occasional acid flashback".
Lebowski's passion is bowling. When he's not rolling the ball down an alley
towards a strike, things just happen to him. Arriving home one night, he's
beaten by thugs attempting to collect money that his wife owes them. Even
worse, they urinate on his rug. The problem is that The Dude doesn't have a
wife. His assailants realize that their target is a different Lebowski when
they glance around at his apartment. The "Big" Lebowski (David Huddleston) is
a multi-millionaire and his Dudeness lives in two-room squalor.
The next day, our ragtag hero visits his namesake's mansion attempting
compensation for his soaked rug. The carpet is important to him because it
pulls the room together: not surprisingly since it's virtually the only object
there. When he's denied any money, he picks up a replacement rug off the
floor. On his way out, he runs into Lebowski's trophy babe wife Bunny (Tara
Reid) who offers to perform a sexual act that, according to rumor, is one of
Bill Clinton's favorites for a thousand bucks. The penniless Dude wisecracks
that he's heading for the cash machine.
Later he gets an unexpected phone call enlisting his aid in being the bag man
to deliver a ransom to Bunny's kidnappers. This begins the trademarked Coen
brothers crimes-gone-wrong sequences. The kidnappers are impossibly inept. The
Dude and his cronies are even worse. Every plan goes awry. You can almost see
Lebowski's brain churning in slow motion as he tries to figure out the clues.
That's the story, but to tell the truth it doesn't much matter. There could be
almost any plot and the film would be just as entertaining. The narrative only
exists so we can watch the offbeat characters and the quirky predicaments they
fall into. The Dude's bowling buddies Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve
Buscemi) look like people you'd see on the street but, like everything else in
this film, they're not quite what they seem.
Walter is a vet as stuck in Vietnam as The Dude is in the sixties. Everything
that happens reminds him of a situation in the Nam. When a fellow bowler
crosses the foul line but won't admit it, Walter pulls a gun on him until he
marks a zero on the score sheet. Donny gets precious few words in between
Walter's screaming and The Dude's rambling. When he does, Walter shouts him
down with horrendous albeit seemingly unintentional bowling puns. Donny is
"out of his league" and doesn't "have a frame of reference".
The film is peppered with people for whom the term "character" would be an
understatement. The Big Lebowski's daughter Maude, an avant-garde "vaginal"
artist, paints while swinging naked in a leather apparatus like an S&M Mary
Martin. The kidnappers are German  techno nihilist bikers. Bunny Lebowski is a
high school cheerleader turned porno star.
Most impressive is John Turturro in his far too small role as a Hispanic
bowler. As the flamenco music swells, we see him putting on his lavender hose.
The camera pans up to an all-purple skin-tight bowling outfit with "Jesus"
(pronounced with a "J", not an "H") embroidered on the pocket. He addresses
the lane with intense seriousness and one painted fingernail. His tongue
slowly snakes out and lovingly licks the glowing bowling ball.
Bridges works The Dude as if he had been living him for decades and maybe he
has. I can't think of anyone else who could have done a better job. Buscemi
has a limited role, but he plays it perfectly. The more that I see John
Goodman the more convinced I am that he's one of the treasures of our time.
It's odd to think that most of the world knows him only as Roseanne Barr's
television husband.
More like the Coen's "Raising Arizona" than their hit "Fargo", "The Big
Lebowski" demands an open mind and even more open eyes. A mark of the Coen
brothers is that even with all wonderful dream sequences and the broad
slapstick physical comedy on the screen, much of the humor is subtle and easy
to miss. There's so much going on that frequently it disappears before you can
see it.
Walking out of the theater, I felt that the film had something important to
say. On further examination, I wasn't sure exactly what it was. "If you meet
Jesus at the bowling alley, it's not going to be what you expect"? "When the
going gets weird, the weird go bowling"? Maybe there's no real message.
Perhaps it's just a roller coaster ride through a hilarious world. Maybe
that's enough.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and just realized that he
was so taken with The Dude that he ran out of space to talk about "The Man In
The Iron Mask" starring that favorite of 14-year-old girls of all ages.
Redman@bvoice.com is the eaddress for estuff.)
[This appeared in the 3/19/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
John Beachem
Imagine if someone came into your house demanding money, and when you didn't
come up with it right away, they urinated all over your rug. Not just any rug
either, it was the rug that really tied the room together. What would you do?
While this may not sound like anything which even resembles a setup for a film,
it's exactly how "The Big Lebowski" starts. Like the television show,
"Seinfeld", "The Big Lebowski" is basically a movie about nothing. It doesn't
have much of a plot, it's about characters who wander aimlessly through
pointless lives, and this big, shambling movie borders on being a comic
masterpiece.
Jeff Lebowski (Jeff Bridges), better known as "The Dude", has just had his rug
defiled by a couple of thugs. You see, these thugs mistook The Dude for another
Lebowski (David Huddleston), who just happens to be a millionaire. It would
seem that The Big Lebowski's trophy wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), owes money all
over town. So, after consulting his best friend, a shell shocked Vietnam vet
named Walter (the hysterical John Goodman), The Dude decides to get a
replacement rug from The Big Lebowski. This soon leads to the discovery that
Bunny has been kidnapped, and The Dude is hired by Lebowski to deliver the
money for her safe return. What follows is a hilarious series of mistakes and
misunderstandings, as the dude finds his peaceful, laidback, alcohol filled
life completely rearranged. If this so called plot sounds a tad confused,
that's because it is. Even the film's narrator (Sam Elliot) confesses to having
lost his train of thought at one point.
Let me say that this isn't an easy film to review. There isn't much of a plot
for me to discuss, and there's nothing even remotely serious about what plot
there is. Perhaps the best way to proceed would be to discuss each of the
multitude of colorful characters at work here. To start with, we have The Dude
himself, played by the perfectly cast Jeff Bridges ("Arlington Road",
"Starman"). The dude is a comical looking hippie, stuck in the '90s when he
belongs in the '60s. This shaggy looking pacifist has only two important things
in his life: drinking and bowling. Next up, we have Walter Sobchak, as depicted
by the brilliant, hilarious, and always underrated John Goodman ("Bringing out
the Dead", "Fallen"). Walter is a Vietnam veteran who is utterly convinced that
everything in life relates in some way to the Vietnam war; whether it be
bowling, kidnapping, or peeing on someone's rug.
While The Dude and Walter are the focal points of the film, they are surrounded
by hilarious characters. Maude Lebowski (Julianne Moore) is the daughter of The
Big Lebowski, and she paints in the nude while hanging from the ceiling on a
cable. Donny (Steve Buscemi) is a brain dead surfer who hangs out with Walter
and The Dude. Of course, we can only assume he's brain dead since Walter never
allows him to complete a sentence. Jesus, the bowler (John Turturro), is a
paedopheliac who dances to salsa music whenever he makes a strike, and who we
see going from door to door telling people that he's a paedopheliac in
accordance with the law; but it's still something you can't picture someone
really doing. Brandt (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is The Big Lebowski's butler, who
laughes inanely at anything anyone says and is the only person The Dude meets
up with who actually calls him The Dude (he hates being called Lebowski). There
are dozens more, but I don't have room to list them all in this review.
The film's main strength is in its bizzare characters and equally unusual
situations. For example, there is a scene in which The Dude drinks a drugged
White Russian (his favorite drink) and goes through a hysterical dream sequence
called "Gutter Balls". The movie's only weakness is that it's difficult to keep
a film going for more than two hours when there is no plot to speak of. As a
result of this, the film does falter at times, particularaly towards the end
where things get a bit too sentimental. All that aside, "The Big Lebowski" is a
brilliant, crazy comedy which could only have come from the Cohen brothers. The
film does run a bit too long at  minutes, but it manages to keep the laughs
coming for nearly the entire length. While the rather unusual humor might not
be for everyone, I strongly recommend it to those of you who like off the wall
stories about off the wall characters, and I give it a well earned four and a
half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Mike Cameron
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, David Huddleston, Julianne Moore,
Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Tara Reid, Flea,
John Turturro, David Thewlis, Ben Gazzara, Sam Elliott.
    It seems, perhaps out of what is, by now at least,a force of habit, that
people have a tendency to define a generation, or more aptly, an era by
decades.  Baby Boomers: The 60's.  The Disco Era: The 70's.  GenX/Cheesy Pop
Synth Music/British New Wave Era: The 80's, also refered to as the me
decade.  So, we are now in the 90's, which will be over in a few years, and
what will call this decade?  So far, we have a generation defined of this
era, Slackers.
    Now, this is not to say that the Cohen boys are Slackers by any means.
They have created some of the most entertaining films of the past 10+ years,
and achieved world-wide fame and glory, public and critical success and
praise with "Fargo."  Their follow-up "The Big Lebowski" is more closely
related to their previous efforts, "Raising Arizona" and "The Hudsucker
Proxy."  What they present is a somewhat dis-jointed collection of oddball
characters that drift in and out of a losely structured film.
    The lead character, one Jeff Lebowski, is a jobless, slightly shiftless
layabout, meandoring through life in LA in the early 1990's, who prefers to
be called The Dude.  He is mistaken one fateful evening by some low rent
thugs for another Jeff Lebowski, The Big Lebowski (David Huddleston) who's
wife has apparently ran up quite a tab with a local pornographer.  To drive
home their point, they urinate on his rug.  He then goes to the home The Big
Lebowski looking for compensation, is refuted, scams a rug from The Big
Lebowski's assistant (Phillip Seymour Hoffman), meets the wife in question,
Bunny (Tara Reid) and her drunken nihilist boyfriend (Peter Stormare) on his
way out.
    This leads the way for The Dude's involvment kidnap scheme involving
Bunny, that is alot more complicated than it should be, at least when The
Dude's friend/bowling partner Walter (John Goodman) becomes involved.  What
follows are the introduction of many weird characters, including Julianne
Moore as Maude, The Big Lebowski's estranged avant-gaurde artist daughter,
who has more than a passing interest in The Dude, Steve Buscemi as Donnie,
the third partner in The Dude's bowling leauge, who is contantly having
trouble keeping up with conversations and being to shut up and Ben Gazzara
and the pornographer who may or may not have had Bunny abducted.  These
characters, along with hilarious cameos by John Turturro as a bowling
pedophile named Jesus, Sam Elliot as The Stranger, who pops-up, as well as
narrarates the story,  intermittently, and Daved Thewlis as a John
Waters-esque friend of Maude.
    All of these characters, along with the abuse suffered by The Dude's
car, make the plot inconsquental by comparison.  In fact, what appears to
the main plot, Bunny's kidnapping, is wrapped in such a lazy "Aha!  So the
real cuprit is..." fashion, that it's almost ant-climatic when it is
revealed.  But again, the plot takes a back seat to the characters and what
the movie is really about.
    And what is that?  Well, take a look in the time period in which the
movie is set.  I believe that the Cohen's choose the early 90's for a
specific reason.  We were coming out one already pre-defined decade and into
a new, shapeless era.  The Slackers were taking over, and the Baby Boomers
were following their lead.  We were a people, much like The Dude, with no
driving force behind us, since no one had yet to tell us what were or what
we going to be.   Coming out of The Me Decade, we just didn't care about too
much else except that me factor, and although political correctness hadn't
quite taken over, we could see it was on it was way, well, we had better
take it easy while we could.  Even the "plot" , with it's lazy, generic
"twist," seems as if it was pulled right out of a late 80's/early 90's tv
Perry Mason movie.
    So, the Cohen brothers take look at our culture, makes fun of
it/us/themelves, and manage to make a highlt entertainingmovie all at the
same time.  Because even if you don't "get it," they've managed to put
enough off-the-wall scenarios to al least keep you wondering excatly what
they are going to come up with next.  I mean, after all, excalty how long
can that car last, anyway?

Author
Randy Turgeon
Summary
    Mistaken identity spells disaster for The Dude (Jeff Bridges), the laziest
man in L.A. County. Two thugs invade his home and assault him, looking for
money
to pay off his wife's debt. The only problem is The Dude is not married and we
learn that although his real name is Jeff Lebowski, it is not the same wealthy
Jeff Lebowski who has a wife that owes money to the wrong people. The thugs
leave, but not before one of them urinates on The Dude's prized rug.
    The Dude wants reparations for the loss of his rug. After conferring with
his two bowling buddies Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi), he
decides that since his rug was ruined due to the negligence of Jeff Lebowski's
wife Bunny (Tara Reid), he should seek out the Big Lebowski himself (David
Huddleston) for restitution. It does not go well, as Mr. Lebowski scolds and
berates The Dude as if he were a child caught stealing money from his mother's
purse.
    The Dude's dealings with Lebowski are not finished however as The Dude is
hired to be a courier for him. It appears that Bunny Lebowski has been
kidnapped
and Lebowski needs someone to deliver the ransom to her captors. The Dude
accepts and with the help of Walter promptly botches the delivery. Nothing
worse
could have happened to The Dude as he becomes fully involved in the bizarre
situation surrounding Bunny Lebowski including involvement in pornography
industry and association with German nihilists.
    Could the scenario possibly get worse for The Dude? His love interest is
the
Big Lebowski's daughter Maude (Julianne Moore), who initially assaults him also
(she didn't care for his solution for his rug replacement). She is quite a
character, as flying around in a harness while naked, spraying paint appears to
be her favorite pastime, and her acquaintances would make Marilyn Manson seem
like a Boy Scout. The Dude must deal with all of these strange people (his
friends included), unusual circumstances and survive countless assaults (some
self-inflicted) to uncover the truth to the wacky Lebowski family.
Commentary
    After the credits rolled for this film I sat in the theater trying to
decide
whether I actually liked it or not. Two hours later I still could not make up
my
mind. To call this film "offbeat" would be a tremendous understatement. There
are some truly bizarre films that work well (Matthew Bright's 'Freeway' comes
to
mind), and some films that have some bizarre moments (the Gimp scene in 'Pulp
Fiction') that have the same effect. The Big Lebowski falls under the former
category and some elements work, some do not.
    The Coen's definitely have a style all their own. If you were to walk in on
this movie and not know what it was, you could pick out it was 'a Coen' in
minutes, much like Stanley Kubrick films. The Big Lebowski's high points are
definitely vintage Coen: colorful characters, a great ear for dialogue,
seemingly unnecessary extra characters (like Marge Gunderson's lunch date in
'Fargo') and funny self-parodies. All of these elements are well done. Jeff
Bridges does a wonderful job playing the spaced out Dude, and John Goodman gets
the great role of the psychopathic Vietnam war veteran on the verge of a
killing
spree. This film is funny and has some nice comic subtleties, like when the
Dude
goes to the Supermarket just to buy cream and pays for it with a check.
    What I did not like was the fact that this movie is far too strange. I
enjoy
offbeat films more than the average movie fan, but this was ridiculous. It
tries
too hard. What was the point in having the Maude character introduced with that
silly harness? What was with those strange dream sequences? I usually dislike
dream sequences because it gives the director free reign to do whatever they
please without explanation. The only normal character may be Donny, if only
Walter would actually let him speak.
    It would have been nearly impossible for the Coens' to duplicate the
success
of 'Fargo', but this film is a slight disappointment nevertheless. However, I
will still marginally recommend the film because it does have its' moments, and
it is unfair to hold it up to 'Fargo' standards.
Directed by Joel Coen
The Dude....................Jeff Bridges
Walter......................John Goodman
Donny.......................Steve Buscemi
Maude.......................Julianne Moore
Big Lebowski................David Huddleston
Nihilist....................Peter Stomare
Bunny.......................Tara Reid
Written by Randy Turgeon, March 11, 1998.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, David Huddleston, Julianne Moore,
Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Tara Reid, Flea,
John Turturro, David Thewlis, Ben Gazzara, Leon Russom, Jon Polito, Sam
Elliott
The first thing a fan of the Coen Brothers' previous effort, "Fargo," must
do is completely obliterate any recollection of that film and brace one's
self for a film that is arguably the most wacky film they've ever made. 
With a bigger budget, more refined sets, and a wide release on its opening
release date, this film could easily be too awesome for its own good.  The
Brothers Coen could get too ambiguous and too wild with money and make a
total mess of a film, much like Danny Boyle's "A Life Less Ordinary," his
film following the brilliant "Trainspotting."
"The Big Lebowski" is a mess, but my god, what a wonderful mess of a film. 
The film is as disjointed, overly-exaggerated, incredibly weird, and as
disconnected from reality as its protagonist, L.A.'s most lazy and
self-centered human being.  This wonderful person is named Jeff Lebowski (a
long-haired, scuzzy Jeff Bridges), otherwise and preferably referred to as
"The Dude."  We don't learn much about this man, but he lives in a big L.A.
house, goes bowling every couple of hours, drinks White Russians as much as
he can, smokes pot regularly, and is unemployed.  Only in L.A.
One night, the Dude comes home to find a pair of hoodlums who attack him,
asking for some money that he has no idea he stole from them.  To be tough,
one of the men piss on his favorite rug before realizing that they got the
wrong Lebowski.  See, there's another Lebowski in town who's rich, referred
to as "The Big Lebowski" (Charles Durning's dead ringer, David Huddleston,
who was Grandpa Arnold on "The Wonder Years"), and his young nymphomaniac
gold digger wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), apparently owes money all over town,
and that's why the men came to beat up Lebowski.
The Dude's visit to the Big Lewbowski's mansion to get paid for the
pissed-on rug is what becomes the catalyst for the rest of the story, which
really takes off once the Big Lebowski receives a ransom note from some
unknown assailants who claim to have kidnapped the now-missing Bunny. 
Since the Dude met the people (in the first scene) who the Big Lebowski
believes kidnapped his wife, he asks him to be the courrier for the million
dollars he needs delivered to them so he identify them for him.  From this
point on, the plot goes completely wacky, and to reveal what happens
further would minimize most of the fun, which is so weird and wacky that
it's unbelievable.
What the Coen's do best is crete a world disconnected completely from
reality.  No one in their world is supposed to be an exact duplicate of a
real person; they're all distinct eccentric characters who live completely
out of reality.  "The Big Lebowski"'s best feature is the wide assortment
of characters, which is probably the best set they've ever had for a movie.
 Every character is different from everyone else, and each of them is fully
allowed to be their own person.  Even cameo characters are brilliantly
realized.
The most fascinating character is that of the Dude's one bowling partner,
Walter (John Goodman), who was apparently shell shocked in Vietnam (as he
constantly reminds everyone around him), and handles his bowling league
like it was a religion.  He gets so into trying to help the Dude in his
giant dilemna that he ends up making things worse, yet never becomes an
annoying character.  Of the four characters Goodman's played in the four
films he's been in this year alone thus far (can you believe it?), this is
probably his most electric and best performance.
Other characters include: the Big Lebowski's bitter freaky artist daughter,
Maude (Julianne Moore), who tries to help the Dude in several ways; Donny
(Steve Buscemi), the more reserved bowling league partner who always seems
to be out of touch with what's going on; Brandt (Philip Seymour Hoffman,
the boom mike guy with a crush on Dirk from "Boogie Nights"), the Big
Lebowski's hallowed assistant; a wealthy porn producer (Ben Gazzara); and a
group of Sweedish (or German) "nihilists," one of them played by Flea, and
another played by "Fargo"'s Peter Stormare (Gaer Grimsrud), who shows up in
other places throughout to high comic effect.  In smaller cameos are a
hispanic bowling competitor of the Dude's named Jesus (John Turturro), who
makes bizarre threats each time we see him; and an arty friend of Maud's
played by a John Waters-looking David Thewlis.  Oh.  And Sam Elliott stars
as the on-again/off-again narrator, who mocks the process by sometimes
forgetting what he's going to say, and popping up in the story from time to
time.  As you can see, this is one hell of a character line-up.
The plot itself is all over the place, filled with gaping holes, and
unfolded in a leisurely, weird pace.  The film, though, never suffers by
it, and in fact, is better off being this way.  It's a film that may be
weird a lot of the time, and sometimes just plain incoherent, but for those
who can appreciate it, it's a wild, wild ride.  Everything in the film is
exaggerated, and played for the highest comic effect, so much that after
about an hour it almost hurt to laugh.  This is easily the funniest film of
the year thus far, which, when you think of it, is not great feat.
The acting from everyone is brilliant, as everyone is given a character
they can play around with.  John Goodman is easily the best supporting
character, while everyone else does marvelous work with their respective
characters, each giving them individual quirks to make them more
fascinating.  Julianne Moore gives her character a faux-Euro Trash accent,
while Philip Seymour Hoffman seems to have a smile surgically frozen on his
face.  John Turturro oozes with camp, while Steve Buscemi brilliantly
maneurvures through a role where he has to be told to shut the fuck up
every time he speaks.
But the actor who really gives the film some depth is Jeff Bridges, who is
absolutely brilliant as the Dude.  His character is not at all the most
fascinating character, but he's the one who sets the tone for everything to
come.  Bridges is a very talented actor, and here, he's at his comic best,
being completely aware of his slothness, and still not caring about it.  He
makes the Dude the film's most likable character, and is completely
believable every step of the way.
So what's this film about?  To tell you the truth, I'm not really sure.  It
could be a criticism of America's slothness, or a paen to it, as the Dude's
the film's most moral and sympathetic character in a film filled with crazy
people who do way too much.  Or maybe it's a film about trying to find a
happy medium between the two.  Whatever it's about, the thing about this
film is to just sit back and enjoy the ride.  The only problem is not the
lack of any real substance, but the fact that it does go on too long.  By
the end, I was just waiting for it to end, even though once I got there, I
was kinda disappointed.  But the completely wacky and lazy storytelling,
which jumps all over the place at will, is done so to show the world of the
Dude the best.
"The Big Lebowski" is not one of the Coens' best film.  But even the Coen's
worst is still one hell of a film, and this is the weakest Coen film since
"The Hudsucker Proxy," and therefore still pretty amazing.  Anyone
expecting a "Fargo" is at the wrong film.  But if one lets themselves go,
"The Big Lebowski" is outrageously fun entertainment, even if it doesn't
seem to have a purpose.  Oh well.  That's what you get for going to see a
comedy.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        The Coen brothers are strange.  If their films reflect their
personalities in any way, I probably wouldn't be terribly interested in
meeting them, not because I wouldn't like them, but because I would fear
them.  That's okay--chances have it I'll never meet them.  I'll continue
to watch their films, though, and probably continue to enjoy them.  
        The Big Lebowski fits nicely into that Coen style, a mold in which they
amalgamate original humor with violence and high numbers of expletives. 
At the same time, the film is essentially pointless.  I find this to be
a strong point.  It's occasionally nice to see a movie that doesn't
force feed a Deep Meaning, but simply forces viewers to pay attention
because it's jam-packed with pop-culture references and bowling jokes. 
Wait, now that I think about it, The Big Lebowski features a deeply
complex bowling motif.
        Jeff Bridges stars as a man named Jeff Lebowski, but he goes as The
Dude.  The Dude is an unemployed loser (for lack of a more concise
word).  He does bowl, though, and presumably he is very good.  He bowls
with his friends, Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi).  The
first scene of the film places the Dude in a situation in which he is
roughed up by a couple of thugs looking for a man named Lebowski.  The
Dude quickly explains that they have the wrong man, but it's too late: 
they have already urinated on his Oriental rug.  
        Irate (or, as irate as the Dude can get), he heads to meet this
Lebowski (the Big Lebowski, played by David Huddleston).  The Dude
demands that his carpet is replaced.  And...
        Wow, I could just go on and on.  The story unravels so quickly, and
there are so many developments that I don't know where to stop summing
it up and end the paragraph with "It goes on from there."  It's all
about the consequences the Dude faces just because he wanted his rug
replaced. 
        It's entertaining and engaging all the way through because there are a
lot of well-drawn characters.  The Dude, for instance, played with
wonderful indifference by Bridges, is easily the most interesting
washout I've ever seen.  He always has a dumbfounded look on his
dim-witted face, even when he gets splashed with paint and toilet
water.  I don't think he utters more than one or two original thoughts
in the entire film; most of his dialogue is in reflection of the ongoing
destruction of his car.
        John Goodman, in just over two months, has now appeared in four films
this year.  Miraculously, I'm not sick of him yet--I suppose this
proves, to some extent, that he can change enough from film to film that
I don't grow tired of his antics.  He utilizes the f-word very well
here, and seems perfectly fit to play a Vietnam vet who ain't afraid of
nothin'.  Julianne Moore, who needs to be in every film, is wonderful
here as the Big Lebowski's somehow-British feminist daughter, Maude.  We
get the feeling she adopted the British accent because she thought it
was cool, and wanted to project the coolness in her voice.
        And there is the usual array of colorful cameo characters.  John
Turturro is disturbingly amusing as a purple-clad pederastic (is that a
word?) bowling freak named Jesus (that's Gee-zus, not Hey-soos).  David
Thewlis has a juicy two-line cameo as a girly friend of Maude's.  Steve
Buscemi gets cursed at a lot by Goodman.  And Sam Elliott shows up a
couple of times to brief us on the state of the characters, and to
provide a few closing thoughts.
        Coen films work because, even at their most ridiculous moments, they
still convey hints of realism.  I never doubted that any of the
ludicrous things happening on screen could actually happen in real
life.  I didn't care much for the excessively-strange dream sequences,
but in a film this over-the-top, I can accept it to go a little further
over the top.  The Big Lebowski is a funny, entertaining movie.  And,
like I said, it has no point.  What makes a pointless Coen film
different from the average pointless film, however, is that the chances
are you'll remember the Coen film for quite a while, even if it is just
to figure out what that damn bowling metaphor means.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     THE BIG LEBOWSKI, the Coen brothers' latest cornucopia of colorful
characters, shares more with their earlier 1987 movie, RAISING ARIZONA,
than their recent Oscar sensation, FARGO.  A zany comedy about a hippie
bowler and his bowling buddies covers the cinematic map.  Mixing
everything from a million-dollar ransom of an ex-porn actress to
bowlers dressed in horned-Wagnerian costumes and dancing in Busby
Berkeley-style choreography, the Coen brothers leave few topics
untouched.  Although the dream sequences are by far and away its high
points, the film does devote some energy to sketching the outlines of a
plot.  But if you demand a strong narrative drive and characters who
are more than just loony, this probably isn't the picture for you.
     It all starts when The Dude, played with a freeze-dried hippie
look by a perfectly cast Jeff Bridges, gets attacked by a bunch of
Germans, who are either Nazis or Nihilists.  It seems his wife Bunny
(Tara Reid) owes money to some pretty unsavory characters who want it
back now, or they'll use his rug for a toilet.
     There's only one problem, he doesn't have a wife.  He does,
however, have a real name, Jeff Lebowski, which unfortunately is shared
by a filthy rich but chintzy guy, who goes by the name of The Big
Lebowski (David Huddleston).  And the worst part of The Dude's tale of
woe is that all this happens during his prime bowling season.
     The perpetually unemployed Dude, with his wardrobe of thrift-shop
castoffs, has reached a point in his life when he is content to wile
away his time hanging out with his buddies, Walter and Donny, at the
lanes.  Walter, played to the hilt by John Goodman from THE BORROWERS,
is an ex-Vietnam vet who sees everything as somehow related to his time
in Nam.  Go over the foul line and not admit it, and he's pulling out
his gun.  Steve Buscemi, last seen in THE WEDDING SINGER, plays Donny,
a guy who can't get a word in edgewise.
     The Big Lebowski calls on The Dude to be the bagman when Bunny
gets kidnapped.  And, you guessed it, the transfer of the money is less
than successful.  This, of course, gives the story's chain pot smoker a
chance to run into a few of the eccentrics who populate Coen movies.
(The movie could easily spawn a prequel about The Dude's life.  We
learn, among other things, that he was once a radical member of the
famous Seattle Seven.)
     Julianne Moore drops in from on high as The Big Lebowski's
daughter, Maude.  Maude is an artist who obsesses over sex and likes to
paint while naked.  When The Dude meets her, the nude Maude flies over
him like Peter Pan in a leather harness as she heads to the canvas to
splatter it with paint.
     As an ultra-competitive bowler named Jesus Quintana, John Turturro
gives the show's most outlandish performance.  With his lavender
clothes, his half-dozen rings, and his single painted fingernail, he
licks his bowling ball while flamenco music plays in the background.
He and his buddies are out to win the league competition and love
making threats to The Dude and his team.
     Ben Gazzara plays a pornographer named Jackie Treehorn, who
believes that "the mind is the biggest erogenous zone."  Like the
businessman in THE GRADUATE who recommended plastics as the future,
Jackie sees software as his industry's most lucrative direction.
     Of the aforementioned dream sequences, the best called "The Gutter
Ball" and set to the music of "I just dropped in to see what condition,
my condition is in."  Many other scenes are ones that only Ethan and
Joel Coen could contrive.  One of the best has the Germans throwing a
pet marmot into the tub when The Dude is taking his bath.  As the
rodent heads for his private parts, the bad guys demand their money.
     Still, the movie is more fascinating than funny, one you're more
likely to discuss afterwards that laugh at while it is playing.
Although the movie engenders many a nice chuckle, more often you're
likely to be thinking a silent "wow" to yourself.
     "So what do you do for recreation," Maude asks The Dude.  "Oh,
bowl, run around, and the occasional acid flashes," the perpetually
stoned Dude replies.  He may not have much of a life, but it's his
life.  He and his buddies share a single battle cry that gets them
through good times and bad: "Let's go bowling!"
     THE BIG LEBOWSKI runs 1:55.  It is rated R for profanity,
violence, nudity and drugs and would be acceptable for teenagers if
they are older and mature.

Author
Kevin Patterson
With the exception of their surrealistic satire Barton Fink, the films of Joel
and Ethan Coen fit into two broad categories: quirky and sometimes darkly
humorous takes on the "film noir" genre in which crime schemes go wrong and
spin increasingly out of control (FARGO, MILLER's CROSSING, BLOOD SIMPLE), and
off-the-wall comedies centered around an eccentric, scatter-brained lead
character (RAISING ARIZONA, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY). Their latest offering, THE
BIG LEBOWSKI, falls within the latter category, though there are elements of
the crime-gone-wrong theme and even a touch of satire to be found in this
film. The main difference, however, is that while the protagonists of RAISING
ARIZONA and THE HUDSUCKER PROXY had lofty aspirations and ideals but didn't
quite have the brains to get it all together, the main character of THE BIG
LEBOWSKI seems like a fairly intelligent guy who's wise to the world, but he
doesn't really want to do much of anything besides go bowling, smoke pot, and
generally relax. 
That main character is Jeffrey "The Dude" Lebowski (Jeff Bridges), introduced
by the film's rambling narrator (Sam Elliott) as "quite possibly the laziest
man in Los Angeles county." The Dude is unemployed, needless to say, and
spends most of his time at the bowling alley with his two best friends, Walter
(John Goodman), a borderline-psychotic who's in the habit of pulling a gun
when he thinks somebody's cheating in a bowling match ("Has the whole world
gone CRAZY?!" he shouts at a suspected cheater), and Donny (Steve Buscemi),
who's always a few steps behind the conversation and is constantly berated by
Walter for it ("Donny, you have no frame of reference here!"). These three
seem to more or less live for bowling tournaments, and as the film begins they
are anticipating an important match with rival bowler Jesus Quintana (John
Turturro), who, when we first meet him, is doing a dance in the bowling lane
to accompany a Spanish version of "Hotel California" and, if it's possible,
seems to be even more of a head case than Walter. 
If that doesn't give you a good idea of this film's absurdist tone, then
perhaps this will: the entire scenario which drives the story is set in motion
by two thugs mistakenly urinating on the Dude's rug. They've mistaken him for
a millionaire of the same name who is also known as the "Big" Lebowski (David
Huddleston) and whose nymphomaniac wife Bunny (Tara Reid) owes money to porn
producer Jackie Treehorn (Ben Gazzara). The Dude goes to the Big Lebowski
seeking compensation for his ruined rug; he doesn't have any luck, but when
Bunny is apparently kidnapped, the elder Lebowski asks him to deliver the $1
million ransom. 
Unfortunately, Walter gets involved and fouls up the drop-off, and before they
can try again to get the money to the supposed kidnappers, the Dude's car gets
stolen, along with the briefcase containing the money. Soon, the Dude is being
harassed not only by the Big Lebowski himself but also by Treehorn and by a
group of German "nihilists" who demand the ransom money even though they may
not have been involved in the kidnapping in the first place; the Dude and
Walter suspect that Bunny may well have kidnapped herself in order to extort
money from her husband to repay her debts to Treehorn. Meanwhile, the Big
Lebowski's daughter Maude (Julianne Moore), a feminist avant-garde artist who
likes to make grand entrances swinging through the air naked, wants to recover
the money for her family. 
The plot, however, is really just a vehicle for all these bizarre characters
to run wild and wreak their own unique forms of havoc. The previews for THE
BIG LEBOWSKI feature Creedence Clearwater Revival's "Run Through The Jungle,"
and it fits: the Coens see Los Angeles as a veritable jungle of oddballs and
nutcases, with the sometimes bewildered Dude left to run through it and try to
avoid any more trouble (usually unsuccessfully). The film doesn't feature
quite as many one-liners and sight gags as the Coens' other comedies (though
there are a few hilarious moments of visual humor, particularly in the Dude's
dream sequences and acid flashbacks), but it more than makes up for it with
the sheer fun of watching these strange characters interact. The film
sometimes seems a little disjointed as a result - you get the feeling that the
Coens have not only set their characters loose in this "jungle" but are also
themselves running crazy through the jungle of their own twisted imaginations
- but for the most part the characterizations are interesting enough to
overcome the shaky plotting and what turns out to be a somewhat anticlimactic
resolution. 
There's also a noticeable (but not too heavy-handed) thread of social
commentary in THE BIG LEBOWSKI, which, incidentally, takes place just as the
Gulf War is about to begin; at the beginning, we see George Bush on television
making his "This aggression will not stand" speech. The Coens take aim at just
about every elite L.A. subculture in the book: the egotistical wealthy
businessman ("The bums will always lose!" shouts the Big Lebowski at one
point), the porn industry, the overbearing Malibu policeman who berates the
Dude for disturbing their "peaceful beach community," and so on. By the end,
we really start to admire the Dude, who almost certainly harbors the least
"aggression" of anyone in this story; his passive resistance (emphasis on
"passive," albeit) to the elite emerges as something more than just another
quirky characterization in a film overflowing with quirky characters. He also
turns out to have a pretty well-functioning brain in his head, even if he
doesn't like to use it very much; his sarcasm towards Treehorn and the Malibu
policeman shows that he knows when he's getting a run around, and he does
manage to unravel the kidnapping mystery by the end. 
The Coens certainly poke fun at the Dude for his laziness, but they don't just
treat him as fodder for cheap shots either. I think that, more than anything,
is what makes THE BIG LEBOWSKI a standout comedy: it manages to approach
characters like the Dude and, to some extent, Walter, with genuine affection
while still acknowledging that they are pretty scatter-brained. Audience
members may find themselves surprised at how much they like the un-dynamic duo
by the end of the movie, given that they seemed like nothing more than the
butts of an extended joke at first. "It's good knowin' he's out there, the
Dude, takin' it easy," posits the narrator towards the end. I dare say that
truer words have seldom been spoken.

Author
Dennis Schwartz
BIG LEBOWSKI,THE (director:Joel Coen; screenwriters: Joel & Ethan Coen;
cinematographer: Roger Deakins; cast: Jeff Bridges (The Dude), John
Goodman (Walter Sobchak ), Julianne Moore (Maude Lebowski), Peter
Stormare (Nihilist), Philip Seymour Hoffman (Brandt), David Huddleston
(The Big Lebowski), Steve Buscemi (Donny), Sam Elliott (The Stranger),
John Turturro (Jesus Quintana), Tara Reid (Bunny Lebowski), 1997)
This is a man's film, for the kind of a man who is lost in his sense of
being a man and lost in the nostalgia of the '70s drug scene. The women
all have minor parts and are viewed as sex objects or conniving harlots.
It's the 1990s and we're in layed back L.A. and there's a character
called Lebowski (Bridges), who likes to be called "The Dude." His two
other bowling pals, Walter (Goodman) and Donny (Buscemi), like him, are
dysfunctional. The plot unfolds into a series of mistaken identity
scenes and over-the-top comedy, by mistaking "The Dude" for another
Lebowski, a wealthy cripple, the story takes on the weird humor of the
Coen Brothers, as they build a case for this likable California bum to
get satisfaction over his pride being hurt. He plays out a very funny
fantasy role, spoofing the Raymond Chandler private detective type of
stories in the Hollywood of the '40s.
You see, the story is about intruders who piss the Dude off when they
piss on his rug. So he goes to the rich Lebowski (David Huddleston) and
asks payment for his rug's damage, using the logic that it is this guy's
fault why it happened, even if he didn't do it; after all, he does have
the same last name and this mistake wouldn't have happened if that was
not the case. So you see the direction this film is going, it is
cartoonish in characterization, with ridiculous dialogue, plenty of zany
characters, and no discernible plot. Stars make cameo appearances and do
their shticks, even if it adds nothing to the plot. The John Turturro
one, where he plays the flaming Mexican queen, is particularly funny.
The absurd story goes on with the Big Lebowski hiring "The Dude" to be a
private detective for him and get back his kidnapped wife Bunny (Tara).
But since "The Dude" is just being set-up, it really doesn't matter that
he is not qualified for the job, even if he does take this job to be a
serious one, and his dim observations of things are humorously abetted
by his friends even dimmer observation of things, which makes things
really seem absurd.
The comedy here is sometimes so sharp, that you could roll in the aisle
with laughter and not seem any odder than the characters you see
onscreen. The John Goodman character, of the hot-tempered, ex-soldier,
and adage prone advisor to "The Dude," is hysterically funny. In one
bit, he tells one of his bowling opponents, " this is not 'Nam, this is
bowling. There are rules." Everything about John Goodman's character
will apply to his tour of duty there, whether or not it is relevant to
the situation.
It is not as good a film overall as Fargo, but it is funny enough to be
a minor work in the Coen brothers continuing attack on our sitcom
culture. It also added a nice touch by having Sam Eliott, with his rich
melodic voice, garbed as a cowboy, do the voice-over, adding touches of
inane wisdom; such as, his saying in mock seriousness, "sometimes you
get the bear, sometimes the bear gets you." This only adds more
absurdity, to a story that was already bizarre to begin with.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Matt Williams
The Coen Brothers have consistently released a string of quirky,
offbeat, but highly entertaining films with only one minor stumble
(Miller's Crossing). While The Big Lebowski delivers more of their
typical oddball characters and situations, it is an unfortunate
disappointment.  This time, they have all the parts together, but
someone forgot the glue.
Jeff Bridges stars as "The Dude" Jeff Lebowski, but not The Big
Lebowski. That appellation belongs to a millionaire (David Huddleston)
who happens to have the same name as The Dude, but much bigger enemies.
Or at least his trophy wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), does.  But it doesn't
matter much to The Dude when those enemies, in a mix-up, come knocking
on his door.
The Dude, you see, is a relic from the 60s.  His hippie lifestyle has
devolved over time into an endless haze of smoking marijuana, drinking
White Russians, and bowling.  His bowling partners don't have much of a
life either. There's Walter (John Goodman), an obsessed Vietnam vet with
a hair trigger, and an irrational devotion to his ex-wife.  And then
there's the wimpish Donny (Steve Buscemi), who's the team's best bowler,
but gets no recognition and little respect from his teammates.
So, as the Dude gets entangled in the plot, through no fault of his own,
he meets a plethora of unusual characters.  Julianne Moore appears as an
uber-feministic artist.  Peter Stormare is a German nihilist with an
attack ferret.  Coen regular John Turturro has a cameo as Jesus, a
bowler with strange predilections.  There's even a cowboy, Sam Elliott,
who narrates the tale.
However, the sensation this time around is like a bunch of jigsaw pieces
from different puzzles hammered together.  The Coen's better work, such
as Raising Arizona or Barton Fink, each had the same menagerie of
bizarre characters, but in those films there was some sort of common
thread that linked them all together.  They all seemed to belong in the
same world...something that's not true of The Big Lebowski.
Taken on an individual basis, the characters are funny.  Jeff Bridges
does another superb turn in the film's central role, enhancing his
character with a seemingly effortless comic touch.  Goodman's outbursts
are amusing, but they seem staged. Many of the other characters are
overshadowed by their own quirks.
Visually, the film is a treat, particularly in the film's elaborately
staged dream sequences.  They serve no narrative purpose in the film
(like many other things), but they're a hoot to watch.
The central problem with the film seems to be on the script level.
There are plenty of good concepts and interesting characters, but the
end result seems more like a scrapbook than a screenplay.
The Big Lebowski is a failure.  But, on the bright side, it's a Coen
Brothers failure, so, even if the film has little point and even less
cohesion, you've got quirky characters and strange situations to divert
you.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
I have no rugs in the apartment, beyond the necessary absorbent bath
mat.  The people in the apartment below mine aren't there most of the
time, maybe on weekends but that's about it.  I think in real estate
marketting lingo, Apartment 3C is a pied-a-terre, which is French for
"I am closer to living in a Merchant-Ivory film than you are."  So, I
haven't fulfilled my lease requirements for having 80% of the floor
covered.  Nonetheless, I truly identify with the Dude when some guys
break into his apartment and pee on his rug.
"The Big Lebowski" is the Coen brothers latest film, the first since
they've achieved mainstream appeal with "Fargo".  I'm not sure what to
say about it, beyond that it was damn funny, arguably their best pure
comedy since "Raising Arizona".  Yes, "Fargo", for example, is a funny
film, but there's a certain macabre humor to the whole thing.  The body
count in "Lebowski" isn't that high, and isn't related to the main action.
The central figure is Lebowski, an unemployed bowling league member
in Los Angeles.  He doesn't call himself Lebowski -- he's the Dude to
people who know him.  In some sense, he's like the Man with No Name in
standard Westerns, except he's not quite a Man of Purpose and Action.
Through mistaken identity, his rug, which really brought the room
together, is ruined, sending him off on a quest to get a new rug.
He's the object of larger forces and designs, rather than the shaper of
these external powers, just going with the flow.
That's the basic plot.  I won't go further into it, partly for the sake of
not revelaing spoilers, partly because the the plot is there more to show
Lebowski, his friends, the people they meet, and Coens-style absurdity.
There are elegant dream sequences involving Julianne Moore, and this
fantastic shot from inside a bowling ball as it rolls down the lane.
The miracles of fibre optic cameras are revealed here.
There's not that much more to say about the movie beyond, go see it.
Yes, there may be bits and pieces of the idea of identity -- the Dude is
basically as you see him, unlike most of the other people in the movie,
even the John Goodman character who clings to Shabbat despite being an
Irish Catholic -- as well as the Dude being like a block of uncarved
wood in a sort of Taoist/Buddhist philosophizing, but, fundamentally,
it's a funny film.  Not much more needs to be said.

Author
Brandon Stahl

You're inside bowling ball, rolling down the lane.  Up and down, up
and down, not sure why you're there.  The only thing you are sure
about is you're on a drug trip.  What happens when you hit the pins?
"The Big Lebowski" for all intents and purposes, is an insane movie.
It's filled with a laundry list of weird and discpicable characters,
has an even longer line of plot twists, and just for fun, a couple of
dream sequences (or drug trips, however you'd like to call them) are
thrown in. At the end of the film you realize that you're left with
memorable scenes, but not a memorable movie.
At the center of "The Big Lebowski" is " the Dude" or Jeff Lawbowski,
the "laziest man in the world" played by Jeff Daniels.  The movie
opens with this description of him: "Sometimes there is man, and he's
a man for his time and place.  And that's the dude."  And that man has
no job, but has an unlimited supply of drinks and drugs and enough
left over to pay rent on a nice aparment.  He writes checks for
$0.79 and he bowls. His only identifiction is a Ralph's grocery
card.
I've always enjoyed the Coen's films because they are, if nothing
else, original and inventive.  Here, they've tried so hard to be
original that they've created a lot of ideas, but not much of a movie
to hold them together.  The plot moves along like an episode of
Seinfeld on crack.  It goes something like this: The Dude is mistaken
as another Lewbowski (played by Charles Durning) by two thugs who want
money.
To show that they mean business, the thugs urinate on the Dude's rug
(which, as he says, "just held the room together).  The Dude wants a
new rug from the other Lebowski, who is paralyzed, happens to be a
wealthy tycoon.  Said Tycoon tells him no, but later summons him back
to his mansion so the Dude can help him recover his kidnapped daughter
(because he thinks that the same men who kidnapped his daugther also
urinated on the Dude's rug), the Dude agrees, but lets his insane
bowling partner help him out.  The bowling partner (played by John
Goodman) screws up the plan and instead of trading money for the
daugther, the partner just gives the kidnappers his dirty underwear.
That's just the first 30 minutes.  On second thought, it's more like a
soap opera on crack. You never guess where you're going next, but
then, you don't really care.  Did I like "The Big Lebowski"? No. But
that doesn't mean others won't.  It has the right kind of humor and
story to develop a cult following (like most Coen movies) but this one
didn't entertain me.  Maybe I was looking for more of a story rather
that two hours of characters that are in serious need of a
psychiatrist.
"The Big Lebowski" (** and a half out of four stars) A movie written,
produced and directed by Joel and Ethan Coen.  Starring Jeff Daniels,
John Goodman, Julianne Moore, and Peter Huddleston

Author
David Dalgleish
The Coen brothers make two kinds of movies.  The first kind are 
idiosyncratic takes on established Hollywood genres: BLOOD SIMPLE, 
MILLER'S CROSSING, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY.  The second kind are just 
plain idiosyncratic: dark comedies which can only be described as 
Coen-esque, and represent their best work (RAISING ARIZONA, BARTON 
FINK, FARGO).  Their latest effort, THE BIG LEBOWSKI, belongs in the 
latter category, in that it is a non-generic dark comedy (unless 
KINGPIN-meets-EXCESS BAGGAGE is a genre)--but it is not one of their 
better efforts.
Jeff Bridges stars as Jeff Lebowski, aka The Dude, Duder, or, if 
you're not into the brevity thing, El Duderino.  He's a pretty simple 
L.A. guy with a pretty simple life: he's unemployed, he smokes pot, 
and League Bowling is his first priority.  He bowls with opinionated, 
borderline-psychotic Vietnam vet Walter (John Goodman) and dimwitted 
Donny (Steve Buscemi).  But the Dude's simple life is complicated when 
two men burst into his apartment, dunk his head in the toilet, ask him 
to cough up a lot of money which he doesn't have, then urinate on his 
rug when he can't help them.  It turns out that these men were looking 
for another Jeffrey Lebowski (David Huddleston), this one a 
millionaire, and when The Dude goes to the other Lebowski's mansion to 
get his rug replaced, he is soon embroiled in a complex plot involving 
a kidnapping, a botched ransom exchange, a severed toe, a nymphomaniac 
porn starlet (Tara Reid), some neo-Nazis, a flaky New Age feminist 
(Julianne Moore), and malicious law enforcement officials.
THE BIG LEBOWSKI is certainly idiosyncratic, but there is a sense of 
strain about it.  It's cluttered with contrived attempts to be 
original and offbeat: there's a man in an iron lung, a philosophizing 
character called The Stranger (Sam Elliot), an elaborate 
dream-sequence production number.  By trying so hard, it comes across 
as forced; the Coens' vision is naturally skewed, and by pushing it 
they needlessly call attention to that fact.
There is a lot wrong with the movie, but since it's a comedy, the 
fundamental issue is this: is it funny?  The humour is irreverent in 
the extreme: death, pornography, child abuse, and disabled people are 
treated purely as sources of humour.  Some people in our PC 90s will 
doubtless object to this material on principle; my feeling is that if 
it's funny, it doesn't matter how offensive it is--when something's 
not funny, that's when I start to feel offended.  Fortunately, THE BIG 
LEBOWSKI is very funny, and that is its saving grace.  Bridges wins a 
lot of laughs as the hapless, laidback everyman thrown into an 
absurdist nightmare and unable to extricate himself; Goodman is 
wonderful as his headstrong best friend whose well-intentioned 
interference just makes matters worse and worse.
The other characters, however, exist only because they're funny, not 
because the script is particularly interested in them (most notably 
Julianne Moore's Maude), and the plot is a grab-bag of ideas, many of 
them inspired, but thrown together in a slapdash way.  The movie lacks 
any sense of coherence, and while all the actors are great, several 
are wasted in minor roles: John Turturro has fun with a manically 
over-the-top character, stealing his scenes, but David Thewlis and Jon 
Polito have only walk-on parts, mildly amusing but unnecessary, while 
Buscemi is woefully underused.  The dialogue is refreshing because it 
allows the characters to talk in a roundabout, unhurried, verbose way, 
but frustrating because it takes them an awful long time to get to the 
point.
The Coen brothers have taken pride, through the years, in doing 
things their own distinctive way--they confound expectations--but here 
that strategy has backfired.  For many people (myself included) FARGO 
signalled the Coens' arrival as filmmakers: they had fulfilled their 
potential, and their next movie was expected to be great.  But it 
seems that they have deliberately set out to not make a great movie in 
THE BIG LEBOWSKI, confounding the critics once again.  It is an 
extravagant entertainment, but shallow and ultimately pointless.  
Considered as a self-contained work, it is good; in the context of the 
Coens' career and their considerable talent, it is a disappointment.

Author
David Wilcock
(POLYGRAM FILMED ENTERTAINMENT)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 57 MINUTES
STARRING JEFF BRIDGES, JOHN GOODMAN AND JULIANNE MOORE
DIRECTED BY JOEL COEN
After the success of Fargo (1996), the Coens are back again with this not
quite madcap, yet not slow paced comedy/thriller. Jeff Bridges is Jeff
Lebowski, a laid back bowler who prefers to be called The Dude. However, his
name is shared with the local millionaire, and when thugs come round to The
Dude believing him to be the millionaire Lebowski, and then urinate on his
rug, The Dude goes round to the 'big' Lebowski to complain. From here-on,
the Dude is drawn into a plot of kidnapping, deceit and violence. All
presented, of course, in the typical Coen way.
A mixture between Raising Arizona (1987), Blood Simple (1981) and Fargo
(1996), The Big Lebowski is fine entertainment. The cast is excellent, and
features a wide range of slightly mad characters. Jeff Bridges is superb as
the incredibly laid back The Dude. He takes on the character completely and
believable. John Goodman is fun as Walter Sobchak, The Dude's slightly
psychotic friend. A former Vietnam vet, the movie offers a good opportunity
for Goodman to act crazy, and he takes the offer up. He's definitely the
craziest character in this rather crazy movie. Julianne Moore, in a slightly
underwritten part as Maude Lebowski, is good, although her role never really
amounts to anything. Sadly, her character is not developed enough. Coen
regular Steve Buscemi pops up as one of The Dude's bowling pals, and John
Turturro (another Coen regular) makes a very short appearance as one of the
funniest, most madcap, most 'on the edge' bowler walking the earth. Although
his character promises much, it delivers little, and is not in the film long
enough.
The plot is pretty straightforward, and is easy enough to follow. Despite
the large amount of main and supporting characters, it's pretty easy to know
what's going on. This is probably the Coen's most commercial film to date,
although that doesn't mean it isn't filled with pure surreal touches. The
Dude's dreams are great fun to watch, and Joel Coen's direction at the
bowling alley gives the bowlers an almost angelic look. The script is funny,
and although it recycles many gags over and over throughout the film, they
always deliver a laugh when they're repeated. The plot can lag occasionally,
but it pretty much zips along.
The film may be a bit too long for it's own good, but I couldn't care less
because I was enjoying myself so much. And that's the great thing about The
Big Lebowski. It's superb entertainment. Blessed with a great
writing/directing team, and a superb cast, what could of been a pretty
average kidnapping thriller turns out to be an enjoyable comedy. Once again,
the Coen's have delivered a fine, if familiar, film. Just a small note to
the Coen Brothers, though: let's move away from the kidnapping theme, eh?
Nearly every Coen film has been centered around a kidnapping. This is a
small gripe, however, and doesn't deter from the film at all. The Big
Lebowski comes highly recommended.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Mike Cameron
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, David Huddleston, Julianne Moore,
Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Tara Reid, Flea,
John Turturro, David Thewlis, Ben Gazzara, Sam Elliott.
    It seems, perhaps out of what is, by now at least,a force of habit, that
people have a tendency to define a generation, or more aptly, an era by
decades.  Baby Boomers: The 60's.  The Disco Era: The 70's.  GenX/Cheesy Pop
Synth Music/British New Wave Era: The 80's, also refered to as the me
decade.  So, we are now in the 90's, which will be over in a few years, and
what will call this decade?  So far, we have a generation defined of this
era, Slackers.
    Now, this is not to say that the Cohen boys are Slackers by any means.
They have created some of the most entertaining films of the past 10+ years,
and achieved world-wide fame and glory, public and critical success and
praise with "Fargo."  Their follow-up "The Big Lebowski" is more closely
related to their previous efforts, "Raising Arizona" and "The Hudsucker
Proxy."  What they present is a somewhat dis-jointed collection of oddball
characters that drift in and out of a losely structured film.
    The lead character, one Jeff Lebowski, is a jobless, slightly shiftless
layabout, meandoring through life in LA in the early 1990's, who prefers to
be called The Dude.  He is mistaken one fateful evening by some low rent
thugs for another Jeff Lebowski, The Big Lebowski (David Huddleston) who's
wife has apparently ran up quite a tab with a local pornographer.  To drive
home their point, they urinate on his rug.  He then goes to the home The Big
Lebowski looking for compensation, is refuted, scams a rug from The Big
Lebowski's assistant (Phillip Seymour Hoffman), meets the wife in question,
Bunny (Tara Reid) and her drunken nihilist boyfriend (Peter Stormare) on his
way out.
    This leads the way for The Dude's involvment kidnap scheme involving
Bunny, that is alot more complicated than it should be, at least when The
Dude's friend/bowling partner Walter (John Goodman) becomes involved.  What
follows are the introduction of many weird characters, including Julianne
Moore as Maude, The Big Lebowski's estranged avant-gaurde artist daughter,
who has more than a passing interest in The Dude, Steve Buscemi as Donnie,
the third partner in The Dude's bowling leauge, who is contantly having
trouble keeping up with conversations and being to shut up and Ben Gazzara
and the pornographer who may or may not have had Bunny abducted.  These
characters, along with hilarious cameos by John Turturro as a bowling
pedophile named Jesus, Sam Elliot as The Stranger, who pops-up, as well as
narrarates the story,  intermittently, and Daved Thewlis as a John
Waters-esque friend of Maude.
    All of these characters, along with the abuse suffered by The Dude's
car, make the plot inconsquental by comparison.  In fact, what appears to
the main plot, Bunny's kidnapping, is wrapped in such a lazy "Aha!  So the
real cuprit is..." fashion, that it's almost ant-climatic when it is
revealed.  But again, the plot takes a back seat to the characters and what
the movie is really about.
    And what is that?  Well, take a look in the time period in which the
movie is set.  I believe that the Cohen's choose the early 90's for a
specific reason.  We were coming out one already pre-defined decade and into
a new, shapeless era.  The Slackers were taking over, and the Baby Boomers
were following their lead.  We were a people, much like The Dude, with no
driving force behind us, since no one had yet to tell us what were or what
we going to be.   Coming out of The Me Decade, we just didn't care about too
much else except that me factor, and although political correctness hadn't
quite taken over, we could see it was on it was way, well, we had better
take it easy while we could.  Even the "plot" , with it's lazy, generic
"twist," seems as if it was pulled right out of a late 80's/early 90's tv
Perry Mason movie.
    So, the Cohen brothers take look at our culture, makes fun of
it/us/themelves, and manage to make a highlt entertainingmovie all at the
same time.  Because even if you don't "get it," they've managed to put
enough off-the-wall scenarios to al least keep you wondering excatly what
they are going to come up with next.  I mean, after all, excalty how long
can that car last, anyway?

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The Big Lebowski opens with a wonderful sequence.  We see a bleak
nighttime Western vista, we hear the distinctive voice of Sam Elliott
over the cool Western harmonies of the Sons of the Pioneers singing
"Drifting along with the Tumbling Tumbleweeds."  And then we see a
tumbleweed, rolling gently along the desert plains, slowly moving this
way and that.  And then, all of a sudden, pow!  The perspective shifts,
and we see the lights of the Los Angeles basin below.
And if the whole movie were like that -- which it is not -- we would,
again, be standing in reverent awe at the talents of the Coen Brothers,
Ethan and Joel, creators of Raising Arizona, Millers Crossing, and
Fargo, and two of our great nation's national treasures.  Unfortunately,
the tumbleweed that opens The Big Lebowski is more than just an
arresting visual image, it's a metaphor for its lead character, and
ultimately, a metaphor for this shaggy, meandering movie..
The tumbleweed in question is known as The Dude.  The Dude is described
as the "laziest man in Los Angeles County" -- and therefore a leading
contender for laziest man in the world.  The Dude is a walking, talking
piece of Woodstock Nation twenty-five years past its shelf life.  He's
got no job, no money, and the ability to smoke more pot, bowl more
frames, and drink more White Russians than any six men.
The Dude spends the movie trapped inside a complex and twisty plot
involving the kidnapped trophy wife of a crippled millionaire.  It's the
sort of plot that you'll enjoy watching much more than I'll enjoy trying
to explain it, so I won't.  Let's just say that The Dude is blown by
chance all around Los Angeles, bumping into a stream of warped
characters the same way that the wind bumps a tumbleweed across the
Western prairies.
The plot structure is loosely akin to a Raymond Chandler noir thriller,
with The Dude roaming Los Angeles in the Phillip Marlowe role.  There's
even a cute little vignette where Coen Brothers veteran Jon Polito shows
up, playing a hard-boiled private eye, and assumes that The Dude is also
a detective.  The Dude is utterly bewildered by this comment, as well he
should be -- he takes a passive role throughout the movie, acting only
when necessary.  And in this fashion, he wanders through the movie --
the entire movie, let me add -- wandering around aimlessly, hardly ever
picking up speed.
At first glance, watching this movie circle around the screen like a big
shaggy dog looking for a place to lie down, I thought that The Big
Lebowski was the Coens subtly poking fun at Quentin Tarantino's Los
Angeles.  Then I decided that they were just poking fun at themselves
and their movies.  And then -- in the car, on the way home -- I figured
it out.  The Big Lebowski -- and I mean this as praise, not criticism --
is a two-hour Seinfeld episode.  It's a movie about nothing.
The Dude, of course, is the Cosmo Kramer of this ensemble.  Jeff Bridges
is The Dude, and it's hard to imagine anyone doing a better job.
Bridges owns this movie.  Where a lesser actor could have made The Dude
nothing more than a hippie dufus, Bridges brings a certain depth of
character to the role.  Since we're with The Dude the whole movie, it's
important that he be offbeat without being annoying, eccentric without
being inane.  Bridges is convincing throughout, whether he's delivering
simple truths ("The car is stolen.") or confused blather.
John Goodman is Walter Sobchak, the George Costanza of the group.
Walter's a rageaholic loser who is capable of simultaneously caring for
his ex-wife's Pomeranian and pulling a firearm on an erring bowling
opponent.  Goodman is the source of many of the film's best lines and
funniest belly laughs, and The Big Lebowski is his best film in years.
In contrast, Steve Buscemi is almost the opposite of Jerry Seinfeld.
Whereas Seinfeld is a sharp observational comedian, Buscemi's character
is a dim-witted bowler who has to be reminded every so often what is
going on.  It's a slight part, and Buscemi does only a slight acting
job.  Rounding out the ensemble is Julianne Moore as Maude Lebowski.
Moore is the best reason to see this movie.  She's only in three scenes
-- if you don't count one of the two dream sequences -- but she steals
the show as an embarrassingly frank performance artist with a Katherine
Hepburn accent.
Like in any Seinfeld episode, the plot is almost an afterthought.
What's important about The Big Lebowski isn't the wandering plot, it's
the little vignettes and character and jokes along the way.  This is a
comedy, full of sharp observational humor, a ton of the weird supporting
characters that is the Coen Brothers hallmark, and a couple of
astonishingly well-crafted shots.  As long as you don't go expecting
Fargo -- or The Hudsucker Proxy, for that matter -- The Big Lebowski is
a fun time at the movies.  Pity we don't get to say that too often.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Steve Buscemi, Julianne Moore, 
      David Huddleston, Peter Stormare, Tara Reid, 
      Philip Seymour Hoffman, Flea, John Turturro, Sam Elliot
Director: Joel Coen
Producers: Ethan Coen
Screenplay: Joel & Ethan Coen
Cinematography: Roger Deakins
Music: Carter Burwell
U.S. Distributor: Gramercy Pictures
     In a word, THE BIG LEBOWSKI is a mess.  But what a glorious, 
wonderfully-entertaining mess it is.  This film, the Coen Brothers' 
follow-up to the critically-lauded FARGO, isn't likely to generate the 
same degree of universal praise.  In fact, those expecting something 
along similar lines to the 1997 Oscar nominee may be disappointed.  THE 
BIG LEBOWSKI is an off-the-wall comedy that has more in common with 
RAISING ARIZONA than with FARGO.  Its single weakness, and what amounts 
to little more than a minor distraction, is that it doesn't have much of 
a plot, and what there is contains the kind of gaping holes that even 
the most obtuse viewer can identify.
     Of course, the Coens have never done the same thing twice in a row, 
so it shouldn't come as much of a surprise that THE BIG LEBOWSKI is so 
far afield from FARGO.  Nevertheless, the brothers' inimitable style is 
very much in evidence; if anything, it may be more pronounced here.  
This is one weird motion picture, but I use that term in the kindest 
fashion, because all of the quirkiness adds up to a level of delightful 
humor that few films this side of a MONTY PYTHON enterprise can match.  
This is a comic amusement park ride  a wildly uneven movie that offers 
tremendous pleasure for the moment, even if it doesn't stand up well to 
post-screening analysis and scrutiny.
     The Coens begin by introducing us to their latest protagonist, The 
Dude (Jeff Bridges), a down-and-out, unemployed drifter who is still 
mentally mired in the '60s.  He spends his days moping around his 
apartment, doing nothing and puffing on joints.  On rare occasions, he 
makes his way over to the bowling alley for a league game with his two 
best friends:  Walter (John Goodman), a Polish Catholic Jew who still 
suffers from post-traumatic stress from his days in Vietnam, and Donny 
(Steve Buscemi), a meek moron.  Most of the time, however, The Dude is 
content to stay at home, which is why he's known as "the laziest man in 
Los Angeles County."  That is, until a group of inept crooks confuse him 
with The Big Lebowski (David Huddleston), one of the city's richest 
businessmen.  
     It seems that Bunny Lebowski (Tara Reid), The Big Lebowski's 
ornamental wife, owes a great deal of money to porn producer Jackie 
Treehorn (Ben Gazzara).  Treehorn's men mistake The Dude (whose real 
name is also Lebowski) for their quarry  and it takes them a while to 
realize their error (they're not Rhodes scholars).  Irritated that his 
carpet has been ruined by the intruders, The Dude arranges a meeting 
with The Big Lebowski to extract compensation.  But things don't go 
exactly as planned.  Soon, The Dude finds himself on Lebowski's payroll 
as the bag man handling the ransom for his employer's kidnapped wife.  
But the ever-pragmatic Walter thinks The Dude should keep the money.  
Maude Lebowski (Julianne Moore), The Big Lebowski's daughter, wants the 
money returned to her family.  Meanwhile, some innocent thief steals The 
Dude's car, where the money is being stored.  And, to top matters off, 
there's some question about whether Bunny is really in any danger.
     Much of the humor comes as a result of the sheer ineptitude of The 
Dude.  This guy isn't a bad choice for handling the ransom drop in a 
kidnapping, he's the worst choice.  He's a complete loser, and his 
friends aren't any better.  Walter is a gun-crazy lunatic who threatens 
to shoot a cheater at the bowling alley, and Donny has a vacuum for a 
brain.  Ultimately, The Dude, Walter, and Donny are the kinds of guys 
who seem at home in a Coen Brothers film, but would be wildly out-of-
place anywhere else (including in the real world).  In addition to these 
three, there are a number of colorful supporting characters, including a 
hilariously over-the-top John Turturro as a bowler named Jesus.  
     When it comes to the bowling alley, the Coens order up more laughs 
in a few scenes than can be found in the whole of KINGPIN (a "bowling 
comedy").  Stepping even deeper into their own surrealistic world of the 
bizarre, the brothers use this arena to stage a parody of Busby Berkley 
musicals.  It's called GUTTERBALLS and it features, among other things, 
a dance number with Julianne Moore in a strange, Viking-like costume, 
Saddam Hussein renting bowling shoes, and Jeff Bridges stuck inside a 
ball, looking out.  
     One of the things I appreciated the most about THE BIG LEBOWSKI is 
its mockery of the voiceover narrative.  Readers of my reviews know that 
this is one of my pet peeves, so it was great fun to watch a film in 
which this approach is openly satirized.  THE BIG LEBOWSKI is narrated 
by Sam Elliot, but, during his self-consciously long-winded opening 
monologue (in which he introduces The Dude), he suddenly loses his train 
of thought, and says as much to the audience.  It's rare that any movie 
uses the narrator to comic effect rather than for unnecessary 
exposition.
     Once again, the Coens have chosen their cast well.  With long hair, 
a beard, sunglasses, and a vapid expression, Jeff Bridges is perfect as 
the perpetually-stoned Dude.  Clean-cut and militant, John Goodman's 
profanity-spewing Walter is delightfully off his rocker.  Steve Buscemi 
for once has a relatively low-key role.  As Maude, Julianne Moore is 
given an opportunity to take a walk on the wild side.  And David 
Huddleston plays Lebowski like Mr. Potter from IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, 
wheelchair and all.  
     Problems with the plot notwithstanding, THE BIG LEBOWSKI ranks as 
one of the most audacious comedies of recent years.  The Coens keep the 
jokes coming, although some of them are so subtle they can easily be 
missed (for example, when The Dude writes a check for 69 cents).  
Profane, outrageous, and without inhibitions, THE BIG LEBOWSKI further 
cements the Coens' reputation as independent film makers.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
James Kendrick
director: Joel Coen
screenwriters: Joel and Ethan Coen
stars: Jeff Bridges (The Dude), John Goodman (Walter Sobchak), Julianne
Moore (Maude Lebowski), Steve Buscemi (Donny), David Huddleston (The Big
Lebowski), John Turturro (Jesus Quintana), Peter Stormare (Nihilist),
Sam Elliott (The Stranger), Ben Gazzara (Jackie Treehorn), Tara Reid
(Bunny Lebowski)
MPAA rating: R
review: ***1/2 (out of ****)
Since their film debut in 1984 with the tightly wrought Texas thriller
"Blood Simple," Joel and Ethan Coen have been one of the most eclectic,
original, and downright fascinating creative teams in modern Hollywood.
Their films are highly stylized, deeply embedded in a particular time
and place, and their characters are more often than not everyday people
who get caught up in highly unusual circumstances.
In "The Big Lebowski," their first cinematic offering since the multiple
Academy Award-winning "Fargo," the action takes place in Los Angeles
during the Gulf War, and the hero of the story is Jeff Lebowski, aka The
Dude. The Dude is played by Jeff Bridges -- one of Hollywood's most
underrated actors -- in the best stoned performance since Sean Penn
stumbled through the halls of Ridgemont High.
The Dude is a simple man who has never quite made it out of the sixties.
He has shaggy, shoulder-length hair, a grizzled goatee badly in need of
a trim, and he wears mostly stained tee-shirts, long shorts, and gellies
without socks. He smokes a lot of pot, drinks a lot of White Russians,
and is more than content to spend the majority of his time bowling with
his two buddies, a slightly psychotic Vietnam vet named Walter Sobchak
(John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi), one of those guys who always
wants to be part of the conversation, but never quite makes it in.
One day, the Dude is confused with another Jeff Lebowski (David
Huddleston), this one being a millionaire philanthropist whose trophy
wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), owes a lot of people a lot of money. The main
plot and all its accompanying side-plots and Coenesque diatribes are far
too complicated to get into here. Suffice to say that The Dude becomes
deeply involved with the Big Lebowski when Bunny is kidnaped and The
Dude is asked to be a courier for the ransom money. By the time all is
said and done, Walter has become deeply involved, as has The Big
Lebowski's daughter, Maude (Julianne Moore), a feminist performance
artist, a pornographer named Jackie Treehorn (Ben Gazzara), and a group
of German nihilists led by Peter Stormare, who was so great as the
silent but deadly kidnaper in "Fargo."
"The Big Lebowski" plays like an amalgam of all the Coen Brothers'
earlier efforts. It shares their previous films' strong sense of time
and place, as well as their send-ups of movie genres and political and
cultural ideologies. "Lebowski" has the same kind of crazed caricatures
that made "Raising Arizona" such a hoot; it has surrealistic dream
sequences (one of which involves a Busby Berkley-like dance number) that
characterized the ending of "Barton Fink"; and it has the same kind of
cartoonish look and feel that pervaded "The Hudsucker Proxy."
The film was shot by veteran cinematographer Roger Deakins, who has
worked with the Coens on three other films, "Barton Fink," "The
Hudsucker Proxy," and "Fargo." Deakins always gives the Coens' films a
distinctive visual style, and here he does a brilliant job of capturing
the bright colors of seedy Los Angeles in the early nineties, whether
that by the obnoxious blue bowling suit worn by The Dude's main
competitor Jesus Quintana (John Turturro), or the strikingly manic dream
sequences, one of which involves the dizzy spectacle of watching a
strike from a bowling ball's point of view.
If "Fargo" was the Coen Brothers' most restrained effort in years, "The
Big Lebowski" marks their return to over-the-edge filmmaking. It is
overflowing with style and attitude, which helps make up for the
scattered plot fragments that never quite come together in the end. The
Coens fill the screen with lighting, set design, music, and hilarious
performances from all the leads, especially Bridges and the always
reliable John Goodman, who shows real comic timing in his untimely
'Nam-inspired outbursts and his intense dedication to his adopted
Judaism.
With Joel directing, Ethan producing, and both writing, the Coen
Brothers seem limitless in their capacity to turn our world inside out.
Their talent lies not in their ability to reflect the norms of reality,
but in their potential to dig out the darkest corners of life and bring
them to light. The Coens rejoice in the oddballs of the world, and they
put them center-stage to show that it's not just guys like The Dude who
are nuts, but the entire planet.


Author
David Peak
Starring - Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, etc.
Running time - close to two hours.
The Big Lebowski starts off with narration, like so many other movies do. 
However this narration doesn't seem to be going anywhere.  We are introduced to
the movies main character "the dude" (Jeff Bridges) and before you can think
about anything the movie gets off to a start.  I'm not here to explain the plot
of the movie. You can watch the movie to see that plot, I'm here to explain the
importance of this movie in modern day filmmaking.
I may be biased on the topic of this movie but the Big Lebowski is like no
other movie.  It's flow of scenes is a relief to movies with a formula scene
structure.  It's characters are so deep and different that while watching the
movie you feel like they actually exist.  The acting is also well done as each
actor/actress ( there aren't too many females in this movie ) plays their role
well and keeps the characters interesting.  The first time you watch this movie
it definately holds your attention.  I've watched this movie with a lot of
people, some liked it, some loved it and some didn't care for it.  But all of
them admitted it was an interesting movie.
I'm not someone giving this movie a plug so everyone will go out and rent it. 
I'm just a fan of movies and particulary this movie.  The Big Lebowski is
exactly the kind of movie to watch when you need a movie that can make you
think into it.  While watching this movie you almost become part of it.  Few
movies have that power anymore. The Big Lebowski is a gem among modern movies.

Author
Jamie Peck
Gramercy / 1:50 / 1998 / R (violence, language, glimpses of nudity, drug use)
Cast: Jeff Bridges; John Goodman; Julianne Moore; Steve Buscemi; David 
Huddleston; Peter Stormare; Tara Reid; Philip Seymour Hoffman; Flea; John 
Turturro; Sam Elliott 
Director: Joel Coen 
Screenplay: Ethan Coen; Joel Coen 
You know you're in for a truly different cinematic experience the moment you 
realize Steve Buscemi has been cast as the movie in question's most normal 
character. Such is the case with "The Big Lebowski," Joel and Ethan Coen's 
first venture since their "Fargo" nabbed nationwide acclaim and a mantlepiece 
of Academy Award nods. There's no need to fear that the Coens suffered 
creative burnout with that accomplishment, because "Lebowski" is an effort 
that makes words like "strange" and "unusual" seem like an understatement. 
Thanks in part to delicious characterization and an all-encompassing sense of 
humor, the film is a smashing success. 
The central oddball here is the Dude (Jeff Bridges), an unemployed cad whose 
ambitions appear to be zilch beyond smoking pot, drinking beer and going 
bowling (are you college students already rooting for him, or what?). One 
night, a pair of thugs break into his house and pee on his carpet, a 
threatening act that's supposed to be carried out against a famous Pasadena 
millionaire (David Huddleston) who shares his birth name -- Jeff Lebowski -- 
with the Dude. Once the Dude realizes this coincidence, he visits the Big 
Lebowski in hopes to claim reparations for his soiled rug, and is back to his 
normal life with alley pals Walter (John Goodman), a hotheaded Vietnam vet, 
and Donny (Buscemi), a mild-mannered surfer, before too long. 
Soon, though, Lebowski's trampy trophy wife Bunny (Tara Reid) is kidnaped and 
held for a hefty ransom, and he turns to the Dude for help. It seems Bunny's 
troubles are related to a line of work she's kept secret from her husband -- 
she's actually an adult film star and is very in debt with a shady producer 
named Jackie Treehorn. The Dude, now on Lebowski's payroll, accepts the offer 
and agrees to handle the money drop; Walter tags along and insists that the 
Dude keep the cash for himself. Chaos obviously ensues, and the Dude 
eventually finds himself in hot water with cops, crooks and Lebowski's 
ultra-eccentric artist daughter Maude (Julianne Moore). 
"The Big Lebowski" deserves to win the Coens the same amount of acclaim that 
"Fargo" did; while that 1996 black comedy was certainly a better film, 
"Lebowski" is at least as breathtakingly imaginative. The movie boasts a 
mile-high absurdity level that sometimes threatens to topple over, but 
thankfully never does. The Coens (Joel directed, Ethan produced and both 
wrote) keep you in stitches as they unravel their exceedingly loopy tale, and 
must be commended for juggling a number of people and subplots one would 
expect to find in a Robert Altman flick. Whether we're watching Bridges fend 
off a marmet in his bathtub or Moore don Viking duds and dance in a Busby 
Berkeley-esque dream sequence, "The Big Lebowski" is immensely lively. There 
are those who will dislike this film, but not because it's boring. 
The cast has a great deal of fun with the bounteous material they're given. 
Bridges exudes a likeable, surprisingly sweet presence; his Dude sure isn't 
the cleanest guy around, but you'd still follow him to another movie. Goodman 
merits 1998's first Oscar consideration, as Walter's manic temper is one of 
"The Big Lebowski"'s many highlights; the same goes for Moore, whose throaty, 
delectable performance as Maude is a hilarious hoot. John Turturro may very 
well steal the movie with his two scenes as a colorful bowler from a rival 
faction. Sam Elliott's rambling narration gets the film off to a solid start. 
And some will recognize Peter Stormare -- "Fargo"'s silent heavy -- as Carl 
Hungus, a porn star who's really a samurai sword-wielding German nihilist and 
has-been pop star. 
Only in its final third does the movie falter, with a couple of loose plot 
threads and some cast members who quickly disappear and never emerge for a 
curtain call. These flaws are forgivable, though -- the Coens have crafted a 
tale so rich with personality that it's hard to look at the final product 
with anything but a big grin on your face. Without a doubt, "The Big 
Lebowski" is the best film so far this year. Sure, we're only three months in 
and the competition ("Deep Rising," "Desperate Measures," "The Wedding 
Singer," etc.) has been pretty bland, but it's still the gospel truth. Maybe 
during next awards season, "Lebowski" won't be a far cry from "Fargo." 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
